BEGINNING      WITH THE 13 JULY ISSUE, THE ELECTRONIC VERSION OF THE 
PACIFIC RIM ECONOMIC REVIEW WILL BE DISSEMINATED TO SUBSCRIBERS AS 
SEPARATE DOCUMENTS ACCORDING TO COUNTRY OR REGION:  JAPAN, CHINA, 
SOUTH KOREA, SOUTHEAST ASIA.  THE HARDCOPY VERSION OF THE PACIFIC 
RIM ECONOMIC REVIEW WILL CONTINUE TO CARRY MATERIAL ON JAPAN, CHINA, 
SOUTH KOREA, AND SOUTHEAST ASIA UNDER ONE COVER. 

   Table of Contents 

   JAPAN:  Auto Industry - FEATURE:  Japanese Sales of Imported 
Autos Rapidly Expanding 

   Economic Trends - Public Investment Estimated To Reach 510 
Trillion Yen by 2000; MITI Committee Urges Paper Companies To Invest 
Overseas Environmental Issues; Eco-Business Market Valued at $128 
Billion in 2000 

   Financial Issues - FEATURE:  Japanese Banks' Inroads in China 
Commercial Banks; FEATURE:  FY93 Financial Statements of Life 
Insurers Reported; Federation of Credit Associations Restructuring, 
Internationalizing; First Japanese to Establish Hedge Fund 

   Foreign Trade and Investment - CHINA: Tokyo Gas To Set Up Office 
in Beijing; Sanwa Denki To Manufacture Color Monitors in Shanghai 

   INDIA:  Marubeni, Toshiba To Build Two 250,000kw Generators 
UZBEKISTAN; Trading Companies Sign Cooperation Agreements With 
Government 

   VIETNAM:  Itochu in Joint Venture To Manufacture Electric Cable; 
Tomen, Taiwan Firm Establish Joint Venture Can Production Company; 
Honda To Begin Assembling Motorbikes in Ho Chi Minh City; Fuji Xerox 
To Begin Marketing Copying Machines; Firm To Build Large Sewing 
Factory in Ha Tinh 

   Machine Tools/Robotics - April MT Orders Down 12.2 Percent, 
Domestic Orders Drop 20 Percent 

   Petroleum/Energy - NKK Wins LNG Tanker Order From Nippon Yusen 
Subsidiary 

   Telecommunications/Satellites - Toyota Motor Expected To Acquire 
Major Share in Teleway Japan, IDO; MPT Limits NTT Participation in 
Handiphone Market To Nurture Competition 

   CHINA:  Domestic Developments - Ministry of Machine Building 
Plans To Develop Auto Industry; State Commissions Formulate 
Automobile Industry Policy; MPCC Plans To Be Largest PRC Oil 
Refinery by Year 2000; Heilongjiang's Suifenhe Signs Trade Contracts 
With Russia; Heilongjiang Firms Signs Joint-Venture Project With 
Russia; Heilongjiang Company Signs Barter Trade Contract With 
Russia; Hong Kong Firm in Joint Venture to Rebuild Guangdong 
Highways; Guangzhou Wharf Project Being Handled by Hong Kong Firms; 
Hong Kong Firm To Develop Guangzhou Housing Project; Hong Kong Firm 
Invests in Fuzhou Housing Project; Bavarian Bank Sets Up Business 
Center in Shanghai; Netherlands' Largest Bank Opens Shanghai Branch 
Taiwan Group Signs Pharmaceutical Agreement With Beijing Firm; 
Guangdong's Huizhou Builds Joint Venture Container Production Base; 
Thai Group Shows Interest in Shenzhen Subway; Australian Businessmen 
Sign 335 Letters of Intent for Cooperation; Heilongjiang State Farms 
Introduce Foreign Capital Taiwan; International Commercial Bank To 
Return To Ho Chi Minh City; Total Industrial Output Expected To 
Double in Eight Years; Overseas Investment Adversely Affects 
Domestic Tax Revenues 

   NORTH KOREA:  Increased Use of Silicate Bricks Noted 

   SOUTH KOREA:  FEATURE:  ROK Moving 'Full Scale' Into Next- 
Generation Displays; Ministries Differ on How To Revise 
Communications Industry; New Laser Has Applications in 
Semiconductors, Diagnostic Equipment; Auto Technology Imports  Up 
Average of 6.6 Percent Since 1990; Government Stresses Labor- 
Management Cooperation; Government Advocates Creation of 
Regional Economic Body; Reimports of Electronics From China 
Increasing; Kia To Export $40 Million Worth of Car Parts to Japan; 
Daewoo To Export Armored Cars to Malaysia; ROK To Begin 'Officially' 
Exporting Cars to China; Asia Cement To Enter China's Market; 
Undersea Optical Cable Link to Russia To Be Completed in 1995; 
Hyundai Precision To Introduce Technology From Germany; 
Hyundai To Export 'Accents' to Europe, Middle East, Asia 

   SOUTHEAST ASIA -  BURMA:  Hong Kong Securities Firm Establishes 
'Myanmar Fund'; French Company To Build Gas Turbines at Power 
Station; Thai Farmers Bank To Open Resident Office in Rangoon; 

   INDONESIA:  Indonesia Seeks ROK Participation in Oil Field 
Development; P.T. Telkom Launches Global System for Mobile 
Communications; Trade Agreement With Czech Republic Signed; Increase 
in Textile, Garment Exports to Japan Reported; Trade Chamber Expects 
Lower Australian Import Duties 

   LAOS:  Thailand, PRC, Singapore To Establish Trade Complex in 
Laos; Telekom Malaysia To Establish Joint Venture in Sri Lanka; 

   SINGAPORE:  FEATURE:  Electronic Access to Information, Services 
Available By 2000; Singaporean Banks Expanding Into Asia; Increase 
in 1993 Trade With The Netherlands Reported 

   THAILAND:  Foreign Bank Branches To Be Upgraded; Electricity 
Authority To Increase Purchases From Laos; State Bank of Vietnam 
Receives $100-Million Loan 

   VIETNAM:  FEATURE:  Vietcombank Branching Out, Expanding 
Services; Figures on Foreign Investment Projects Reported; $4- 
Billion Investment Projected for Northern Economic Triangle; Foreign 
Banks Seeking to Establish Branches; Joint Venture Planned To 
Exploit Bach Ho LPG; Government Approves 'Largest' Port Construction 
Project; Vietnam To Restrict Import of New Foreign Cars; Foreign 
Investment in Road, Bridge Projects Reaches $700 Million; Foreign 
Investment Capital Figures From 1988 to 1992 Reported; Italian 
Businesses To Invest $48 Million in Vietnam; Construction of 
'Primary' Southern Port Started; Joint Venture To Produce 
Nonalcoholic Beverages Licensed; Singapore Reported To Be Top ASEAN 
Investor; Exports of Rice, Paddy to Taiwan, PRC Reported; Canada 
Opens Trade Office in Ho Chi Minh City; Indonesian Chemical Company 
Setting Up Joint Venture; Construction of 'Largest' Rice Mill in 
Mekong Delta Completed 

   (Pacific Rim Economic Review FBPSP 94-13) 

   JAPAN:  Auto Industry - FEATURE:  Japanese Sales of Imported 
Autos Rapidly Expanding -- SUMMARY:  After reaching record levels in 
FY93, sales of imported autos in Japan are expected to reach new 
highs in 1994.  According to media and industry reports, sales of 
imported autos have surged during the first five months of 1994. 
Market share for imported autos has also increased due to the 
appreciation of the yen and a drop in sales of domestically-produced 
autos. 

   Sales of Imported Autos Reaching 'Record Levels' -- According to 
the 20 June SANKEI SHIMBUN, sales of imported autos reached "record 
levels" in FY93, totaling 217,633 units.  Regarding 1994, Nakahide 
Inayama, president of Yanase and Co., the largest auto import dealer 
in Japan, stated that sales of imported autos are expanding 
"unbelievably" and should surpass the levels reached in FY93. 
Masaji Gumizawa, vice chairman of the Japan Automobile Importers' 
Association, believes that import sales will gain further momentum 
and could top 300,000 units by yearend. 

   According to the following chart, for the first five months of 
1994, sales of imported passenger cars, trucks, and buses totaled 
108,239 units, a 39.62 percent increase over the same period in 
1993.  In May alone, import sales totaled 21,579 units, more than a 
48 percent rise over 1993 and the seventh consecutive year-on-year 
increase.  The following charts are derived from the March 1994 
JIDOSHA TOKEI GEPPO (Monthly Automobile Statistics Report) published 
by the Japan Automobile Manufacturers Association.  March, April, 
and May 1994 figures are from the 8 April, 11 May, 7 June 1994 
NIKKEI SANGYO SHIMBUN, respectively. 


                1993              1994           Percent 
               Sales             Sales           Increase 

   Jan         9,088            12,156            33.76 
   Feb        14,117            17,812            26.17 
   Mar        23,051            32,440            40.73 
   Apr        16,729            24,254            44.97 
   May        14,540            21,579            48.41 

   Total:     77,525           108,241            39.62 



   Import Market Share on the Rise -- The 4 June SHUKAN DAIYAMONDO 
reported that sales of imported autos are increasing, while sales of 
domestically-produced autos are falling.  Consequently, the market 
share for imported autos is continuing to rise.  On a calendar year 
basis, market share of imported autos has risen from 2.88 percent in 
1990 to 3.12 percent for 1993.  For the first five months of 1994, 
the market share for imports has risen to 4.32 percent. 


                   Total            Import       Market 
                   Sales            Sales        Share 

   1990          7,777,493        223,923          2.88 
   1991          7,524,759        199,922          2.66 
   1992          6,959,073        184,615          2.65 
   1993          6,467,279        201,481          3.12 
   1994 
    Jan            357,674         12,156          3.40 
    Feb            519,253         17,812          3.43 
    Mar            679,170         32,440          4.78 
    Apr            502,195         24,254          4.83 
    May            446,703         21,579          4.83 
   1994 
 Total:          2,504,995        108,241          4.32 



   German Autos Maintain Highest Sales -- According to the 20 June 
SANKEI SHIMBUN, demand for imported autos is growing because the 
appreciation of the yen has led to lower prices, which are "meeting 
the needs of consumers."  Foreign automakers are using low prices as 
well as improved quality as "weapons" to sell their cars, the paper 
said.  As the following chart shows, Germany remained the largest 
seller of imported passenger cars in Japan for 1993, even though 
sales of German cars have fallen by nearly 29 percent since 1990. 
SANKEI stated that much of the fall was due to the fact that Yanase 
and Co. stopped handling Volkswagen and Audi cars in January 1993. 
For the first five months of 1994, however, VW/Audi has sold 13,486 
autos, nearly a 50 percent increase over the same period last year. 


Passenger Car Sales:      1990       1991       1992       1993 

Germany Total          137,442    119,048    104,680     97,684 
   Mercedes Benz        38,844     34,187     29,605     27,913 
   BMW                  36,527     33,798     28,532     25,790 
   VW/Audi              53,461     44,562     42,082     24,878 
   Opel (GM)             4,021      2,725      1,371     17,042 

U.S. Total              28,602     30,128     37,085     54,493 
   Honda USA             7,534     14,302     19,835     26,880 
   General Motors        8,513      9,261      9,089      8,525 
   Toyota USA            2,109        862      2,363      7,955 
   Chrysler              1,432      1,491      1,602      5,699 
   Ford Motor            6,030      2,959      3,402      5,111 

UK Total                19,653     17,130     14,914     17,498 
Sweden Total            13,704     12,363     10,494     13,116 
France Total            14,018     10,854      7,906      5,840 
Italy Total              5,933      5,754      4,573      4,565 



   U.S. Automakers Increase Sales, Expect Higher Growth -- Between 
1990 and 1993, sales of U.S.-made autos have increased by more than 
90 percent.  The best selling U.S. import, however, is made by a 
Japanese subsidiary firm, Honda USA.  According to the evening 
edition of the 17 June NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN, Honda USA became the 
largest automobile exporter overall from the United States during 
the first quarter of 1994, having exported 24,877 autos between 
January and March, mostly to Japan. 

   Nevertheless, sales of passenger cars from the U.S. "Big Three" 
automobile manufacturers have also increased greatly over the first 
five months of 1994.  According to the following chart, General 
Motors has increased sales by 11.36 percent, Ford by 113 percent, 
and Chrysler by more than 300 percent over 1993 levels. 


             General Motors      Ford Motor        Chrysler 

             1993     1994      1993     1994     1993     1994 

   Jan        414      529       158      465       40      659 
   Feb        589      712       419      714      156    1,093 
   Mar        924      875       573    1,100      330    1,608 
   Apr        607      687       441      921      378    1,273 
   May        529      608       311      847      501    1,003 

Total:       3063     3411      1902     4047     1405     5636 



   General Motors sold 8,525 vehicles in 1993, but this does not 
include the 17,042 autos sold under the Opel nameplate, which are 
from General Motor's European subsidiary.  According to the 20 June 
NIKKEI WEEKLY, General Motors hopes to increase sales to 100,000 
units by the year 2000.  Ford sold 5,111 vehicles in 1993, but the 
NIKKEI WEEKLY reported that a great majority of those sold were 
actually produced by Ford's Japanese partner, Mazda Motor Corp. 
Nevertheless, Ford hopes that sales of its new Mustang, for example, 
will increase the ratio of imported vehicles to over 50 percent this 
year.  In addition, the 10 June NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN reported that 
Ford plans to import three models with right-hand side steering from 
Europe.  Consequently, the company hopes to expand the number of 
sales outlets from 288 to 700 and to increase annual sales to 
200,000 units by the year 2000.  Chrysler sold 5,699 vehicles in 
1993, and sales are robust due to the success of its right-hand side 
steering Jeep Cherokee, the NIKKEI WEEKLY stated.  The firm expects 
to sell over 13,000 vehicles this year, including the Vision and 
Grand Cherokee. 

   Economic Trends - Public Investment Estimated To Reach 510 
Trillion Yen by 2000 -- According to the 15 June NIHON KEIZAI 
SHIMBUN (NIKKEI), a study shows that the amount of Japan's public 
investment will "surely" exceed the 430 trillion yen ($4.3 trillion) 
goal set in the 10-year public investment plan from FY91 to FY2000, 
which was agreed to by both the U.S. and Japanese Governments during 
the U.S.-Japan structural impediments initiative talks in June 1990. 
That goal takes inflation into consideration and includes machinery 
investment and land purchases as well as actual construction costs. 

   According to the article, the Ministry of Construction's (MOC) 
Committee on Medium- and Long-term Estimates of Construction 
Investment has released a study which predicts that total public 
investment in construction--actual construction costs plus machinery 
investment and land purchases--will reach 510 trillion yen ($5.1 
trillion) between FY91 and FY2000.  The study's calculations assume 
that between FY93 and FY2000 construction investment will increase 
only enough to keep pace with inflation. 

   According to NIKKEI, the study noted that construction investment 
for FY93 is estimated at 31.8 trillion yen ($318 billion), a 4 
percent "real"--i.e., above the inflation rate--increase from FY92. 
If the amount of construction investment continues to increase at a 
"real" annual rate of 4 percent every year from FY93 as the base 
year, it will reach 350 trillion yen ($3.5 trillion) by FY2000. 
Consequently, total public investment in construction from FY91 
would reach 560 trillion yen ($5.6 trillion) by FY2000. 

   NIKKEI reported that the study also included another scenario 
that assumes that there will be no supplementary budget in FY94. 
Based on an estimate of construction investment of 28 trillion yen 
($280 billion) for FY94, instead of the estimated 31.8 trillion yen 
($318 billion) figure for FY93, and an annual growth rate of 4 
percent, the study predicted that construction investment will reach 
310 trillion yen ($3.1 trillion) by FY2000 and total public 
investment will be 510 trillion yen ($5.1 trillion).  Explaining the 
reason for the lower base figure, the study noted that in FY93 
construction investment increased greatly thanks to three economic 
stimulus packages implemented during the year, and therefore "it 
would be difficult to maintain the same rate of increases in 
construction investment from such a high base." 

   The article observed that the MOC study shows Japan will be able 
to exceed the goal of the 10-year plan "without additional public 
investment projects."  It also noted that the study may affect 
current debates between the private sector and the Ministry of 
Finance (MOF) over whether additional public investment projects are 
needed to expand domestic demand when the government reviews the 10- 
year plan in late June.  The private sector has been asking the 
government to implement an additional 100 trillion yen ($1 trillion) 
in public investment, while the MOF remains "hesitant." 

   MITI Committee Urges Paper Companies To Invest Overseas -- The 16 
June evening edition of NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN reported that the 
"Committee on Issues Within the Paper and Pulp industry," a private 
advisory group of the Ministry of International Trade and Industry's 
(MITI) Consumer Goods Industries Bureau, estimated in a recent 
report that the Japanese paper and pulp industry will grow an 
average 2.3 percent annually from the present until 2000 while 
demand in China and several Southeast Asian countries is expected to 
grow at an annual rate of 9 percent.  The report recommended that 
Japanese paper companies actively advance into Asia in order to 
compete on the international market. 

   The 10 June NIKKAN KOGYO SHIMBUN observed that Japanese companies 
are being urged to develop overseas markets because it will be 
difficult for them to boost domestic facilities in current 
conditions where the continuing high yen is pressuring companies to 
import rather than produce domestically,  Domestic demand in the 
Japanese paper industry has decreased for two consecutive years 
since 1992 because of the extended recession, and there is a surplus 
supply of 5 million tons because Japanese companies invested heavily 
to boost their domestic facilities during boom economic times.  The 
report projected that domestic demand in 2000 would equal about 32.9 
million tons, which is nearly equal to current production capacity 
of 33.1 million tons.  Paper products, which include newsprint and 
other printing paper, will grow at an annual rate of 2.4 percent to 
19 million tons, and paperboard would grow at an annual rate of 2.1 
percent to 13 million tons. 

   According to the 16 June ASAHI SHIMBUN, the report also mentioned 
specific measures that Japanese paper manufacturers should take in 
order to overcome the severe conditions predicted for the future. 
The report stated that it was essential for Japanese manufacturers 
to shift away from achieving market share supremacy and that they 
should import foreign products instead of making products 
domestically which are not price competitive.  Manufacturers should 
also cut costs for quality control by standardizing quality control 
systems and link up with foreign capital resources to cut costs for 
procuring raw materials. 

   The report also discussed environmental issues facing the 
Japanese paper industry, mainly recycling efforts, the 17 June 
NIKKEI SANGYO SHIMBUN noted.  The report mentioned the "recycle 55 
plan," which aims to recycle and reuse 55 percent of all paper by 
March 1995, and raised the issue of drafting a "post 55 plan."  It 
also stressed that consumers need to have a progressive attitude 
toward recycling paper and that regional governments should create 
measures for recycling. 

   Environmental Issues - Eco-Business Market Valued at $128 Billion 
in 2000 -- On 16 June, the Environment Agency reported the results 
of a study conducted by the Sanwa Research Institute Corp. (SRIC) to 
calculate the future scope of the eco-business market, which 
includes environmental products and services.  The SRIC established 
the base value of the eco-business market at 5.96 trillion ($59.6 
billion) for 1990 and projected that the market would grow by 8 
percent annually from 1990 to 2000 and by 7.8 percent annually 
between 2000 and 2010.  According to the SRIC's calculations, the 
eco-business market will be valued at 12.8 trillion yen ($128 
billion) in 2000 and 26.2 trillion yen ($262 billion) in 2010. 

   The SRIC identified four groups of high-growth environmental 
products and services and drew up estimates for the future markets 
of each group.  The four groups include:  1) environment-friendly 
equipment and pollution prevention equipment; 2) environment- 
friendly products, such as solar power generating systems, household 
energy conservation devices, and low-emission vehicles; 3) services 
dedicated to protecting the environment, such as waste treatment and 
environmental impact assessment services; and 4) businesses which 
maintain the public infrastructure, such as those which build 
transportation systems and energy-conserving buildings. 

   According to the SRIC, services concerned with protecting the 
environment will be the largest growing industry.  The markets for 
pollution prevention equipment, solar power generating systems, and 
household energy conservation devices will expand to exceed 3 
trillion yen ($30 billion) each and stimulate the semiconductor, 
electronics, gas, and petroleum industries.  The electric vehicle 
market, which is projected to achieve a value of 1.8 trillion yen 
($18 billion), will also have a "ripple effect" on the electronics, 
rubber, and resin industries.  (Tokyo NIKKEI SANGYO SHIMBUN 17 Jun 
94 p 2) 

   Financial Issues - FEATURE:  Japanese Banks' Inroads in China -- 
Summary:  Japan's largest banks have established substantial 
operations in China, and now regional banks are following in their 
footsteps, according to press reports.  The two major problems 
facing Japanese banks--the Chinese Government's reluctance to 
approve offices in Beijing and difficulty in obtaining and using 
renminbi--remain to be solved, but the Chinese Government has 
approached the banks for assistance in several areas. 

   Firmly Established Commercial Banks Increase Lending - The major 
commercial banks, which have already established a presence in China 
(see table below), are increasing their lending volume, according to 
the 24 May NIKKEI KINYU SHIMBUN.  They are driven by the increasing 
demand for funds resulting from economic liberalization and by a 
sense of "wanting to reclaim their place as leaders in the vast 
Chinese market."  As examples, Dai-Ichi Kangyo Bank's loans in China 
have doubled in the last two years, Mitsubishi Bank has increased 
its line of credit at an average rate of 14 percent over the past 
three years, while Sakura and Fuji banks intend to increase lending 
by more than 10 percent in FY94. 

   The following is a list of the offices the 11 major commercial 
and three long-term credit banks have established in China, 
according to the 26 May NIKKEI KINYU.  (B denotes a branch, which 
engages in full banking operations such as taking deposits and 
making loans.  RO denotes a representative office, which does not 
engage in banking operations, but typically gathers information.) 


Commercial Banks  Beijing  Shanghai  Guangzhou  Dalian  Shenzhen 
Tianjin 
Asahi Bank*       RO       RO 
Bank of Tokyo     RO       B         RO         B       B 
Dai-Ichi Kangyo*  RO       B         RO         RO 
Daiwa Bank        RO       B         RO 
Fuji Bank         RO       RO        RO         B       B 
Hokkaido Takushoku         RO                   RO                B 
Mitsubishi Bank   RO       B         RO         RO 
Sakura Bank       RO       B         B          RO                RO 
Sanwa Bank        RO       B         RO         B       B         RO 
Sumitomo Bank     RO       RO        B          RO 
Tokai Bank        RO       RO        RO 
Long-Term Credit  Banks 
Long-Term Credit 
Bank of Japan     RO       RO        RO 
Industrial Bank   of 
Japan             RO       B         RO         B 
Nippon Credit Bank         RO 

   *Asahi Bank also has representative offices in Qingdao and 
Fuzhou, while Dai-Ichi Kangyo has one in Xiamen. 


   'China Boom' Spreads Among Regional Banks -- The 15 April NIHON 
KEIZAI SHIMBUN (NIKKEI) reported that the "China boom" evident among 
Japan's major commercial banks is spreading to the regional bank 
level.  Six banks, five of them regional banks, have been 
tentatively authorized by the Ministry of Finance (MOF) to establish 
overseas offices in 1994.  Five of the offices will be in China and 
one in Hong Kong.  Sumitomo Trust Bank and Hokuriku, Iyo, and Shinwa 
Banks have been authorized to establish representative offices in 
Shanghai, while Fukuoka City Bank has been authorized to establish 
offices in Dalian and Aomori Bank has gotten permission to set up 
offices in Hong Kong.  Two other regional banks, Juroku Bank and 
Nishi-Nippon Bank, have already established offices in Shanghai, 
while Yamaguchi Bank has an office in Dalian. 

   In what is reportedly a rare move for a medium-sized regional 
bank, the Bank of Nagoya has established "cooperative business 
agreements" with seven regional governments in China, according to 
the 8 March NIKKEI KINYU.  The two most recent agreements were 
concluded with the city governments of Changzhou and Kunshan. 
Cities with which previous agreements were made include Nantong and 
Suzhou.  Under the agreements, the Bank of Nagoya introduces its 
customers seeking joint venture projects and technology exchange in 
China to the city governments.  The bank deliberately seeks 
agreements in the more remote areas of China where it can negotiate 
directly with the leaders of the regions.  It has been building this 
network of cooperative business agreements since 1985, NIKKEI KINYU 
reported. 

   Even credit associations are seeking business in China, according 
to the 25 April NIKKEI KINYU.  The National Federation of Credit 
Associations has received informal authorization from the MOF to 
establish an office in Hong  Kong in October and plans to set up 
representative offices in Shanghai and Dalian to assist Japanese 
companies entering the China market.  With the new offices, the 
association expects that individual credit associations will be 
doing business with 530 Japanese businesses operating in China and 
Hong Kong in 1994. 

   Key Issues Are Beijing Branches, Acquiring Renminbi -- So far no 
bank has a branch in Beijing, and upgrading representative offices 
to branches in the capital city is the "linchpin" of their business 
strategies in China, according to the 26 May NIKKEI KINYU.  Building 
good connections to the central government through branches in 
Beijing is the key to penetrating the interior regions, the paper 
asserted.  To this end five banks--Sumitomo, Sanwa, Industrial Bank 
of Japan, Bank of Tokyo, and Mitsubishi--are waging a "public 
relations war" to be the first bank authorized to upgrade their 
Beijing representative offices, according to the 2 March NIKKEI 
KINYU.  The Bank of Tokyo and Mitsubishi Bank made direct personal 
appeals to the mayor of Beijing in February for the upgrade, while 
Sumitomo Bank, considered the most likely candidate for a full 
branch, held a three-day seminar in mid-March for the benefit of 
Chinese banks, which was "highly praised" by Chinese authorities, 
according to the 8 April NIKKEI KINYU. 

   The Chinese Government has proposed that the banks form "joint- 
venture banks" with Chinese banks in conjunction with their requests 
to establish Beijing branches, according to NIKKEI KINYU.  China is 
reportedly seeking a transfer of the financing and supervisory know- 
how of Japanese banks to the Chinese side through the "joint-venture 
banks," but the Japanese are reportedly ambivalent.  However, the 
article observed they can not afford to ignore the Chinese 
authorities' requests.  Competition from U.S. and European banks is 
leading the Japanese banks to gradually accept the government ' s 
proposal. 

   Another key issue facing banks is the difficulty of obtaining 
local Chinese currency, renminbi, the 26 May NIKKEI KINYU reported. 
Japanese banks cannot satisfy the large-scale funding Japanese 
companies require to build factories because foreign banks are 
prohibited from dealing in the local currency directly.  Currently 
Japanese banks can meet small-scale needs for funds by introducing a 
Japanese company to a local Chinese bank, where the Japanese company 
can open an account and withdraw renminbi. Occasionally a Japanese 
bank will guarantee a renminbi loan for a Japanese company.  But on 
the whole it is difficult to obtain renminbi, according to the 26 
May NIKKEI KINYU, and authorization to use the currency could be "a 
matter of life or death" for Japanese banks in China, according to 
the 8 March NIKKEI KINYU. 

   The MOF has made a formal appeal to the Chinese authorities to 
lift the ban on the use of renminbi, while executives from 
Industrial Bank of Japan, Mitsubishi, Sanwa, and Sakura and other 
banks have made informal appeals, according to the 23 May NIKKEI. 
Earlier in the year, Japanese banks discussed the issue with the 
People's Bank of China, according to the 8 March NIKKEI KINYU, and 
from that discussion understood that they would be allowed to use 
renminbi on a trial basis for deposit-taking functions. They 
interpreted this as the first step toward full banking operations, 
according to NIKKEI KINYU.  But the 25 May ASAHI SHIMBUN reported 
that the People's Bank of China had not yet completed its revision 
of the rules governing foreign banks' use of renminbi and that 
"there was no possibility of it doing so in the near future." 

   Bank Support Networks Intended To Stimulate Direct Investment -- 
In an attempt to assist small-to-medium-sized corporations entering 
the China market, Sanwa Bank conducted a series of seminars in 
"caravan" style, traveling throughout Japan, visiting over 100 
branches and engaging 2,500 bankers, according to the 26 May NIKKEI 
KINYU.  The "caravan" style seminar is designed to expand Sanwa's 
support services to its branch customers seeking to do business in 
China.  The bank has also increased the number of China specialists 
working in Japan to provide overall business support to the "Sanwa 
Bank Group" in China, according to the 11 March NIKKEI KINYU. 

   In a similar move to assist its small-to-medium-sized customers, 
Mitsubishi Bank will dispatch over 100 branch managers to study 
economic conditions in China, according to the 26 May NIKKEI KINYU. 
By the beginning of June 1994 it had already dispatched 43 branch 
managers to hear the concerns of Japanese companies already 
operating in China regarding the currency, labor, and legal 
difficulties of doing business there, according to the 6 June ASAHI. 

   Meanwhile, Fuji Bank has sent roughly 50 branch managers to 
Japanese factories in China to research conditions there, according 
to ASAHI.  While visiting factories in Beijing, Dalian, Shanghai, 
and Shenzhen, the branch managers also held discussions with Chinese 
authorities about conditions in China.  The bank has written a 
handbook for small-to-medium-sized businesses concerning Asian 
currencies and financial markets, according to the 1 April NIKKEI 
KINYU, which is devoted primarily to explaining China's newly 
unified exchange rate system. 

   Dai-Ichi Kangyo Bank has increased personnel in its "invest in 
China" group, according to the 3 June NISHI NIHON SHIMBUN, and in 
June for the first time will send branch managers to observe 
conditions in China, with a second delegation being planned for the 
fall. 

   Nippon Credit Bank, one of the three long-term credit banks, held 
a seminar in June teaching regional financial institutions how to 
advise corporations on entering the China market, according to the 
16 June NIKKEI KINYU.  Financial institutions with which Nippon 
Credit does business have been unable to respond adequately to 
companies seeking advice on the business climate in China and the 
seminar was intended to provide a stronger advisory network for 
them. 

   The Bank of Saga, a medium-ranked regional bank, has created a 
China trade and investment research group with 80 corporate members. 
The research group will hold "invest in China" seminars once a month 
until October 1994, according to the 7 June NIKKEI KINYU. 

   Chinese Organizations Request Assistance -- The Shanghai Bankers 
Association, which has 37 members, proposed a business tie-in with 
the Osaka Bankers Association during a visit to Japan in May, 
according to the 7 June ASAHI.  This would reportedly be the first 
tie-in between bankers associations in Japan and China, the paper 
observed.  The tie-in would involve exchanging researchers and 
information on financing conditions within the two countries and 
conducting investment seminars.  While the Osaka Bankers Association 
is currently considering the proposed tie-in, the 7 June MAINICHI 
SHIMBUN reported that Osaka has indicated that it will cooperate 
with the Shanghai association, and according to ASAHI expects to 
receive a formal proposal during the summer of 1994.  A final 
decision on the details of the tie-in is expected by the end of the 
year at the earliest. 

   Finally, the Government of China is requesting the assistance of 
Japanese banks in modernizing its online banking system, according 
to the 24 May NIKKEI KINYU.  It is requesting assistance in creating 
an "online data management system" that links banks with trade, 
tariff, and foreign currency exchange authorities there.  In 
addition, the government is seeking assistance in building a network 
that would allow the use of credit and bank cash cards throughout 
China.  Requests for assistance were made informally through the 
Japanese banks' offices in China and were more formally voiced by a 
representative of the state-run China National Electronics Import 
and Export Corporation during a recent visit to Japan. The data 
management system is expected to be completed within 1994, while 
the cash and credit card network will take the next eight to ten 
years to complete.  For the time being, Japanese banks are using 
know-how from having developed their own payments and data 
management systems in advising the Chinese on the modernization 
scheme. 

   FEATURE:  FY93 Financial Statements of Life Insurers Reported -- 
SUMMARY:  In FY93, Japanese life insurers earned less interest and 
dividend income than in FY92, reflecting the "low interest era," and 
sales of individual insurance policies declined due to a fall in 
personal income, according to press reports.  All major life 
insurers recorded "unrealized profits" of shares they held as 
"special profits" to improve their balance sheets, and some actually 
sold shares and real estate to raise money.  Some mid-ranked 
insurers are having financial problems, which is expected to 
accelerate reorganization of the life insurance industry. 

   The 10 June ASAHI SHIMBUN reported that based on the FY93 
financial statements of life insurers released on 9 June, some of 
the mid-ranked life insurers are having financial problems.  For 
example, Toho Life recorded a recurring loss for the first time in 
the postwar period and Chiyoda Life reported a large number of 
nonperforming assets.  Mid-ranked life insurers tried to compete 
with major life insurers by offering high yield, "saving-type" 
insurance policies and by extending loans to real estate businesses 
during the bubble economy.  After the bubble burst, however, ASAHI 
noted, they had to pay their "dues."  ASAHI commented that the 
financial difficulties of mid-ranked insurers will probably 
accelerate reorganization of the life insurance industry through 
mergers and acquisitions. 

   Revenues Declined -- Japan's eight largest life insurers 
collected approximately 22.3 trillion yen ($223 billion) from sales 
of insurance policies in FY93, a 2.3 percent increase from FY92, 
according to the 10 June NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN (NIKKEI).  While sales 
of individual "annuity-type" and group insurance policies increased 
greatly, sales of individual life insurance policies, the companies' 
main product, remained sluggish. Reasons for the low sales included 
a decline in personal income due to the prolonged economic slump and 
an increase in premium rates starting in April 1993, according to 
the 10 June NIKKEI KINYU SHIMBUN.  The paper concluded that it will 
be "tough" for life insurers to increase sales of their policies in 
the future.  Moreover, Japan's life insurance market is unlikely to 
grow rapidly, since about 90 percent of Japanese households already 
have some kind of life insurance coverage. 

   The 10 June NIKKEI KINYU reported that the total value of 
individual life insurance policies issued by the eight largest life 
insurers increased "only" 5.1 percent--less than the 7.5 percent 
increase in FY92--to 1,170 trillion yen ($11.7 trillion) in FY93. 
All eight life insurers suffered a drop in their rates of increase 
in FY93 compared with FY92.  Sales by Nippon Life Insurance, Japan's 
largest life insurer, increased only 3.6 percent, the lowest rate of 
increase among the eight.  By contrast, the total value of sales of 
individual annuity-type life insurance policies increased 24.1 
percent to 55 trillion yen ($550 billion), according to the 
10 June ASAHI. 

   Yield Rates Fell -- Reflecting the "low interest era," the eight 
life insurers earned "modest" dividend and interest income, from 
3.36 to 4.25 percent returns on their assets, according to the 10 
June NIKKEI KINYU. Although life insurers planned to increase loans 
to companies as a means of stable long term investment, they could 
not loan as much as they hoped to because of the lack of demand for 
funds.  The ratio of loans in the total assets dropped to 39.2 
percent in FY93 from 40.4 percent in FY92. 

   The 10 June NIKKEI KINYU reported that in order to avoid pegging 
assets to low interest rate instruments over the long term, life 
insurers invested their funds in short term instruments, such as 
designated money trust funds, cash deposits, and call lending.  Most 
insurers increased their ratios of designated honey trust funds to 
total assets.  For example, Daiichi Life and Sumitomo Life increased 
their ratios from 2.6 percent and 3.9 percent in FY92 to 4.4 percent 
and 4.9 percent in FY93, respectively. The average ratio of bash 
deposits and call lending of the eight large insurers increased to 
9.0 percent in FY93 from 5.6 percent in FY92.  The ratio of deposits 
and call lending of Nippon Life, in particular, rose from 6.7 
percent to 12.1 percent, which contributed to its "low" yield rate 
of 3.34 percent (4.16 pErcent in FY92). 

   To raise their incomes, all eight life insurers recorded 
"unrealized profits" from shares they held as "special profits," 
according to the 10 June NIKKEI.  Such special profits totaled 544.5 
billion yen ($5.45 billion).  The paper warned that as life insurers 
use up unrealized profits, their financial bases will be weakened. 

   While Nippon Life and Daiichi Life raised most of the money they 
needed from interest and dividend incomes, Chiyoda Life and Sumitomo 
Life sold shares to raise approximately 40 percent of their cash 
needs, according to the 10 June NIKKEI KINYU.  Sumitomo Life also 
sold real estate worth 76.9 billion yen ($769 million) to meet its 
cash needs, according to the 10 June ASAHI. 

   Some Still Have Nonperforming Asset Problems -- According to the 
10 June NIKKEI, the total outstanding balance of nonperforming 
assets (loans extended to companies which have gone bankrupt and 
those on which interest payments have been suspended for more than 
six months) of the eight largest life insurers was 377.7 billion yen 
($3.78 billion), a 6.9 percent decrease from FY92.  NIKKEI reported 
that life insurers actively wrote off nonperforming assets through 
sales of the loans to the Real Estate Resolution Corporation. 

   Although the outstanding balance of nonperforming assets declined 
on the whole, NIKKEI noted that some life insurers still have 
"serious problems" with nonperforming assets.  For example, Chiyoda 
Life has the largest amount, 197.9 billion yen ($1.98 billion), in 
nonperforming assets.  The paper noted that this amount was 
"relatively large."  Chiyoda Life stated that it would resolve the 
nonperforming asset problem "within two years." NIKKEI asserted, 
however, that it would be difficult for Chiyoda Life to do so in two 
years because of the sluggish real estate market.  Another example 
is Sumitomo Life.  Although nonperforming assets held by Sumitomo 
Life itself total 49.1 billion yen ($491 million), its affiliated 
nonbank lenders collectively have a "large" amount of nonperforming 
assets, which required Sumitomo Life to spend a total of 130 billion 
yen ($1.3 billion) to help its affiliated nonbank lenders in FY93. 
The paper concluded that it would take three to five years for 
Sumitomo Life to bail out its affiliated nonbank lenders. 

   Toho Life Records Loss -- According to the 10 June ASAHI, in its 
FY93 financial statement Toho Life, a mid-ranked life insurer, 
became the first company in the postwar era to record a recurring 
loss, 19.8 billion yen ($198 million).  The primary cause was the 
56.7 billion yen ($567 million) lost from sales of foreign 
investment trust funds that contained "hidden losses."  Although 
Toho Life sold Japanese stock shares and real estate to realize non- 
recurring profits, they were not sufficient to make up the losses. 

   The 10 June ASAHI noted that Toho Life expanded its customer base 
by offering high yielding, saving-type life insurance policies 
during the bubble economy.  However, it could not make enough 
profits from domestic investments after the bursting of the bubble. 
To increase profits, according to the article, Toho Life "heavily" 
invested funds totalling 190 billion yen ($1.9 billion) in high- 
return, high-risk foreign investment trust funds during 1991-1992. 
Due to the recent fall in the U.S. bond market and appreciation of 
the yen, however, its foreign currency denominated assets declined 
in value. 

   In the 10 June ASAHI, Toshiuchi Sakogawa, vice president of Toho 
Life, explained that the company decided to sell off foreign 
securities with hidden losses in order to improve its assets, rather 
than making the FY93 financial statement "look good."  He continued 
that Toho Life also expects the next year to be tough, since the 
company intends to sell off the remaining portion of its foreign 
securities with hidden losses in FY94.  In addition, Sakogawa said 
that Toho Life would write off domestic nonperforming or low 
yielding assets to improve its yield rates.  He expects it will take 
three years to finish write-offs and sell-offs of nonperforming or 
losing assets.  In order to improve its financial condition, Toho 
Life plans to reduce its workforce by 660 employees, 20 percent of 
the total, by the end of FY95 through mergers of branches. 

   Federation of Credit Associations Restructuring, 
Internationalizing -- The National Federation of Credit 
Associations, the central bank of Japan's more than 400 credit 
associations, will begin overhauling its organizational structure in 
June in order to increase international operations and enhance non- 
member lending, according to the 2 June NIKKEI KINYU SHIMBUN.  The 
Federation rivals mid-ranking commercial banks in terms of funds 
under management--roughly 13 trillion yen ($130 billion) as of the 
fiscal year which ended March 1994, according to the 23 May NIKKEI 
KINYU.  It absorbs excess funds of the individual credit 
associations to invest in negotiable securities (roughly 40 
percent), make loans (roughly 30 percent), and to lend in the short- 
term money market (30 percent).  Liberalized interest rates have 
made its traditional portfolio management emphasizing securities 
more difficult however, and the overhaul is intended to shift use of 
money from domestic securities transactions to increased lending, 
according to the 2 June NIKKEI KINYU.  This includes participating 
in syndicated loans abroad, more direct lending to members of credit 
associations operating in foreign countries, and increased lending 
to large, non-member corporations, NIKKEI KINYU reported.  As part 
of the reorganization, the Federation's international "section" will 
be upgraded to a department and simultaneously separated from the 
general treasury department, according to the 2 June NIKKEI KINYU. 

   The Federation currently has four offices overseas, a branch in 
New York, a representative office and securities subsidiary in 
London, and a representative office in Singapore, according to the 
23 May NIKKEI KINYU.  It is seeking to shift its overseas focus to 
Asia because an increasing number of credit association customers 
are attempting to enter Asian markets, according to the 25 April 
NIKKEI KINYU.  From a survey it conducted on corporations seeking 
advice on China, for example, the Federation found that the number 
of credit association customers operating there doubled over the 
past three years, with 1993 showing the largest increase in history, 
according to the 13 April NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN.  In order to assist 
these customers, the Federation plans to open a Hong Kong office in 
October followed by offices in Shanghai and Dalian, according to the 
25 April NIKKEI KINYU.  The Singapore office, which previously was 
engaged primarily in research, will begin participating in loan 
syndication.  At home, the 2 June NIKKEI KINYU reported, the new 
international department will include a "trade and investment 
consulting" office to provide information on the local economies of 
China and Vietnam, among other places, and to assist domestic 
Japanese firms in locating joint venture partners in Asia. 

   First Japanese to Establish Hedge Fund -- Koichi Kawai, formerly 
the president of Paribas Asset Management Japan, will reportedly be 
the first Japanese ever to establish a hedge fund, according to the 
14 June NIKKEI KINYU SHIMBUN.  "Hedge fund" is a general term for an 
investment fund employing high-yield derivatives, such as financial 
and commodity futures, swaps and options, according to the 8 June 
NIKKEI KINYU.  The fund will be registered in the Cayman Islands and 
begin operations in September 1994. Kawai, who has already raised 
several billions of yen (roughly $20-30 million), is holding a 
seminar in July to attract investment by Americans.  The fund is to 
be limited to fewer than 100 investors to qualify for exemption from 
regulation by the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission. 

   For the time being, 70 percent of the fund's investment will be 
in small-scale Japanese stocks traded over the counter while the 
remainder will be invested in promising Asian and Latin American 
markets.  The Asian portion of the fund's investment strategy will 
be devised by Kawai, while the Latin American portion will be left 
to a mid-sized U.S. hedge fund, "Emerging Market Advisors," with 
which Kawai will form a partnership. 

   Foreign Trade and Investment - CHINA:  Tokyo Gas To Set Up Office 
in Beijing -- Tokyo Gas, Japan's largest gas utility company, will 
open an office in Beijing on 1 July to gather information on China's 
domestic energy situation and to make preparations to enter China's 
rapidly growing city gas business.  Tokyo Gas plans to use this new 
office to strengthen its relationship with Beijing Gas, with which 
it signed a cooperation and exchange agreement in 1979 to conduct 
technical exchanges and to train Beijing Gas employees.  Tokyo Gas 
is studying the possibility of sending specialists to China in the 
fields of pipelines, pipelaying, and safety technologies.  The 
Beijing office will also collect information on China's foreign 
purchases of gas and track trends in the city gas business 
throughout China. 

   Tokyo Gas, which is already developing the city gas business in 
Malaysia together with Petronas, the Malaysian state-run oil 
company, is considering a preliminary survey in China to see whether 
similar business opportunities exist.  (Tokyo NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN 
11 Jun 94 p 10) 

   Sanwa Denki To Manufacture Color Monitors in Shanghai -- Sanwa 
Denki, Japan's second largest manufacturer of color monitors, will 
establish a joint venture company in Shanghai to produce color 
monitors and video game machines.  The unnamed joint venture will be 
capitalized at 220 million yen ($2.2 million) with Sanwa Denki 
contributing 30 percent; Shanghai Yongxin Shadow Mask Co., a CRT 
manufacturer, 55 percent; Taiwan Le-hsin Electronics, a video game 
manufacturer, 8 percent; and Chiahe Electronics, a Taiwanese 
electronic parts trading company, 7 percent. 

   Sanwa Denki will provide the technology and 80 million yen 
($800,000) worth of production equipment which will be installed at 
one of Shanghai Yongxin's factories, which is currently idle.  The 
factory will begin production on 20 October and have a maximum 
monthly production capacity of 100,000 color monitors and 10,000 
video game machines.  (Tokyo NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN 9 Jun 94 p 22) 

   INDIA:  Marubeni, Toshiba To Build Two 250,000kw Generators -- An 
international consortium, including Marubeni, Toshiba, and the Tapur 
Group,  an Indian conglomerate, is planning to construct a power 
plant in India under a build-operate-transfer arrangement.  Total 
investment for the power plant, which will consist of two 250,000kw 
coal-fired generators, will be more than $500 million.  The 
consortium has completed a preliminary feasibility study and will 
begin a full-scale study within the year with the goal of beginning 
construction in two or three years.  The consortium is also 
considering establishing a joint venture company to build and 
operate the power plant, which will be located near the city of 
Nagpur, in central India. 

   N. K. P. Salve, the Indian minister of power, requested Japanese 
cooperation in this project while visiting Japan in June 1993.  The 
Japanese agreed to participate "on a private basis as a symbol of 
Japanese-Indian economic cooperation."  (Tokyo NIKKEI SANGYO SHIMBUN 
20 Jun 94 p 14) 

   UZBEKISTAN:  Trading Companies Sign Cooperation Agreements With 
Government -- Three of Japan's largest general trading companies, 
Marubeni Corp., Mitsui and Co., and Mitsubishi Corp., have concluded 
economic cooperation agreements with the Government of Uzbekistan. 
The agreements follow the the economic assistance agreements 
negotiated with international financial institutions, such as the 
World Bank and European Bank for Reconstruction and Development, as 
well as the recent commitment by the Japanese Government to extend 
trade insurance to Uzbekistan. 

   Only a general outline of the agreement Marubeni concluded with 
the Uzbek Government has been disclosed.  It involves cooperation in 
ten areas, including extraction and refining of gas and oil, 
processing of agricultural products, establishing communications 
networks, building tourism facilities, and airport construction. 
One project already under way is the construction of a new oil 
refinery in Bukhara with an annual capacity of 2.5 million tons, 
which is scheduled to be completed early in 1997.  The agreements 
signed by Mitsubishi and Mitsui are reported to be very similar to 
that signed by Marubeni. 

   The trading companies have "high hopes" for Uzbekistan despite 
the fact that economic reform has just begun there.  Many projects 
they are planning for Uzbekistan are contingent upon financing from 
the International Monetary Fund (IMF), and they anticipate the IMF 
will shortly authorize between $60 and $70 million in loans to 
Uzbekistan.  (Tokyo NIKKEI SANGYO SHIMBUN 16 Jun 94 p 2) 

   VIETNAM: Itochu in Joint Venture To Manufacture Electric Cable -- 
Itochu Corp., one of Japan's largest general trading companies, and 
a Vietnamese state-owned firm have agreed to form a joint venture 
company to manufacture electric cable.  The Vietnamese partner is 
"Kiyadeibi," a company based in Ho Chi Minh City that is under the 
jurisdiction of Vietnam's Ministry of Heavy Industry.  Initial 
investment in the joint venture will be $5 million, with Itochu 
contributing 10-20 percent and Kiyadeibi the remainder.  The two 
sides are examining whether to use the Vietnamese firm's facilities 
or build a new plant to manufacture the cable.  If their decision is 
to build a new plant, the necessary funds will be borrowed from 
banks. 

   The goal of the two companies is to begin cable production next 
summer at a level of 4,000 tons annually.  Vietnam's current demand 
for cable is about 2,000 tons, but is expected to increase rapidly. 
Although Vietnam's 500-km north-south power transmission project has 
been completed, construction projects are underway to extend 
transmission lines to Vietnam's major regional cities.  In addition, 
new power generating facilities will be built in Vietnam funded by 
official development assistance extended by Japan and other Western 
nations and by World Bank loans, which will require additional 
transmission cable.  If the joint venture is able to reach its 
4,000-ton production target, this would be the first time Vietnam 
has been able to meet domestic demand for cable.  (Tokyo NIKKEI 
SANGYO SHIMBUN 15 Jun 94 p 6) 

   Tomen, Taiwan Firm Establish Joint Venture Can Production Company 
--Tomen, a general trading company, together with President 
Enterprises, a Taiwanese comglomerate, and a Vietnamese state-owned 
company have formed a joint venture company in Vietnam to 
manufacture cans to be used in exporting fruits and vegetables.  The 
Vietamese firm, the Fruits and Vegetables Import-Export Corporation, 
is "under the umbrella" of the Ministry of Agriculture.  The 
Vietnamese Government has high expectations that the joint venture 
will generate large foreign exchange earnings. 

   The joint venture firm, "Tobekan Company," will be headquartered 
in Ho Chi Minh City and will have an initial capital investment of 
$5 million. President will contribute 50 percent, Tomen 25-30 
percent, and the Vietnamese company the remainder.  Of the $8 
million required to build and equip the new company's plant, about 
$3 million will be borrowed from banks. 

   The new company will begin producing cans this summer to support 
exports of Vietnamese pineapple, "other fruits," and vegetables to 
Japan, the United States, and Europe.  In the first year of 
operations the company plans to produce 10.5 million cans, 
increasing to 45 million cans within 3 years and 60 million in 4 
years, which will be a level sufficient to meet Vietnam's domestic 
demand.  (Tokyo NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN 14 Jun 94 p 5) 

   Honda To Begin Assembling Motorbikes in Ho Chi Minh City -- Honda 
Motor will begin the assembly production of motorbikes in Vietnam in 
mid-1995 at a level of 270,000 to 300,000 units per year, according 
to the 12 June NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN (NIKKEI).  The motorbikes 
produced will be 70 to 100-cc displacement "Super Cub" models. 
Honda has applied to Vietnam's State Commission for Cooperation and 
Investment for permission.  (For a report on Suzuki beginning 
motorbike production in Vietnam, see the 18 May 1994 Pacific Rim 
Economic Review, page 12.) 

   According to the NIKKEI article, Honda, as a rule when setting up 
overseas operations, prefers to establish 100 percent-owned 
production subsidiaries.  However, in this case Honda will form a 
joint venture company in which it will hold an 80-90 percent stake. 
The NIKKEI article did not specify the Vietnamese joint venture 
partner, or why Honda decided on the joint venture.  The highest 
amount Honda would invest in the project is 10 billion yen ($100 
million).  An assembly plant will be built in the southern part of 
Ho Chi Minh City. 

   At present in Vietnam imported Honda two-wheel vehicles account 
for more than 90 percent" of the 2 to 2.2 million two-wheel 
vehicles.  Some 270,000 to 280,000 Honda bikes are imported yearly. 
Thus, when Honda begins production, it will have a market 
"monopoly."  The company will gradually develop a sales and service 
network throughout the country. 

   Fuji Xerox To Begin Marketing Copying Machines -- Fuji Xerox, 
through its Singapore subsidiary, Fuji Xerox Asia-Pacific, has begun 
selling copying machines in Vietnam through an agreement with the 
state-owned Vietnam Computer Company 2.  Fuji Xerox decided to enter 
the Vietnamese market now because demand for office equipment has 
expanded more quickly than anyone imagined.  This will be the first 
time Vietnam Computer has marketed copiers.  The company acts as an 
agent for IBM in selling computers in Vietnam. 

   Fuji Xerox must catch up with Ricoh, which began selling copiers 
in Vietnam three years ago through a local sales agent.  Canon, 
another major manufacturer of copiers, has not set up a direct sales 
system in Vietnam. 

   Within the Xerox Group, Fuji Xerox's sales area covers the entire 
Asia-Pacific region with the exception of China.  With its entry 
into Vietnam, Fuji Xerox Asia-Pacific now has a sales network 
involving ten countries, including Australia, Singapore, South 
Korea, and Taiwan.  (Tokyo NIKKAN KOGYO SHIMBUN 3 Jun 94 p 8) 

   Firm To Build Large Sewing Factory in Ha Tinh -- Hikosen, a 
privately owned Tokyo firm that makes women's apparel and sundry 
goods, has received formal approval from the Vietnamese Government's 
Board of Investments to build a sewing factory in Vietnam.  The 
factory, the company's third overseas plant, will be built in Ha 
Tinh City, central Vietnam, in early 1995.  In the 1980's Hikosen 
built a sewing plant in Vung Tao, southern Vietnam, and another in 
the Philippines. 

   While the scale of the Ha Tinh plant has not yet been decided, it 
will be a large facility designed not only for Hikosen's production 
needs but also for use by other Japanese apparel companies on a 
tenant basis.  Hikosen initially plans to employ 400-500 workers, 
but the entire factory complex "at a minimum will employ 5,000 
workers."  The factory will have about 50,000 sewing machines, of 
which Hikosen will use 1,000.  Apparel and sewn goods made under 
Hikosen's label, such as aprons, sweaters, T-shirts, and various 
types of bags, will be exported to Japan via the nearby port of 
Vinh.  Detailed sewing work will be contracted out to local plants 
or individuals. 

   The Vietnamese Government wants to invigorate economic activity 
in northern Vietnamese cities like Ha Tinh, which lack industries. 
It wants to develop Ha Tinh as a large sewing industry center and is 
seeking to expand economic activity through subcontracting and other 
local operations.  (Tokyo NIKKAN KOGYO SHIMBUN 3 Jun 94 p 25) 

   Machine Tools/Robotics - April MT Orders Down 12.2 Percent, 
Domestic Orders Drop 20 Percent --  A survey conducted by the Japan 
Machine Tool Builders' Association showed April machine tool (MT) 
orders dropped 12.2 percent compared to April 1993 to 42.86 billion 
yen ($428.6 million), according to the 8 June NIKKEI SANGYO SHIMBUN. 
Domestic orders totaled 24.243 billion yen ($242.43 million), a drop 
of 20.2 percent.  The 8 June NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN noted that 
domestic orders from the auto industry fell 23.5 percent, while 
those from the general machinery industry fell 22.7 percent. 

   According to the NIKKEI SANGYO, April exports were up 1.0 percent 
to 18.563 billion yen ($185.63 million), with exports to the United 
States, China, and Southeast Asia particularly strong.  Exports for 
the first four months of 1994 were up 6.9 percent from the same 
period in 1993. 

   Petroleum/Energy - NKK Wins LNG Tanker Order From Nippon Yusen 
Subsidiary -- NKK, one of the world's five largest steelmakers, has 
won an order to build a liquefied natural gas (LNG) tanker for Asia 
LNG Transport, a joint venture of Nippon Yusen and a Malaysian 
company.  The contract for the 18,800 cubic meter LNG tanker, which 
will incorporate NKK's Technigas Mark II membrane technology, will 
be valued at 8-9 billion yen ($80-$90 million).  Construction is 
scheduled to begin in September 1995 and the tanker will be 
delivered in the spring of 1997 to Asia LNG Transport, which 
will use it to deliver LNG to a project in Sendai City. 

   NKK reportedly won the order because it had previously built a 
similar tanker for Seibu Gas, and was willing to denominate the 
contract in dollars rather than yen.  Shipbuilding companies are 
shifting their attention to LNG tankers for the domestic market 
because of the high yen and an anticipated shift to the use of 
natural gas by mid-sized regional gas utility companies.  (Tokyo 
NIKKEI SANGYO SHIMBUN 8 Jun 94 p 12) 

   Telecommunications/Satellites - Toyota Motor Expected To Acquire 
Major Share in Teleway Japan, IDO -- Teleway Japan and Nippon Idou 
Tsushin (IDO) announced on 1 June that they will increase their 
capital by issuing new stock through a third-party allocation 
scheme.  Toyota Motor Corp., which is a major shareholder in both 
companies, will assume the stock from both companies "which is not 
spoken for" by other shareholders and is expected to become the 
"number-one" shareholder of both companies and begin assuming 
responsibility for managing operations.  Both companies will settle 
the details at their respective shareholders' meetings in late June, 
and the changes will go into effect in the fall. 

   Teleway Japan will increase its capital to 49.8 billion yen ($498 
million).  About 20 shareholding companies are expected to respond 
to the stock offering, including Toyota, which will increase its 
percentage share in the company from 6.9 percent to nearly 40 
percent.  Teleway Japan calculated a 12.5 billion yen ($125 million) 
loss after final accounting for FY93 and its cumulative losses are 
close to 43.9 billion yen ($439 million).  It expects excess 
liabilities of 10 billion yen ($100 million) for FY94 and is seeking 
to turn pretax profits in the black from FY97.  (Osaka MAINICHI 
SHIMBUN 2 Jun 94 p 10) 

   IDO is increasing its capital to support the 50 billion yen ($500 
million) expansion of the Motorola-based cellular telephone network 
and the conversion to digital systems.  Toyota will assume a share 
of IDO which is three times its current investment and Tokyo 
Electric Power Co. and Chubu Electric Power Co. are expected to 
double their investments. 

   According to figures calculated for FY93, IDO registered profits 
in the black for a fourth consecutive year.  IDO's sales turnover 
was 17 percent higher than FY92 at 94.8 billion yen ($948 million) 
and its pretax profits were 20 percent higher at 1.5 billion yen 
($15 million).  IDO is seeking to increase its sales in FY95 by 20 
percent but expects a downturn of 2-3 billion yen ($20-30 million) 
in pretax profits because it has reduced its basic rates.  It also 
expects an increase in its fixed costs.  (Tokyo NIKKEI SANGYO 
SHIMBUN 2 Jun 94 p 7) 

   Toyota has been an investor in both companies purely out of an 
obligation to personal requests from other executives, but it will 
gain a new responsibility for the companies along with its new 
investment status.  Toyota is designing a full-scale strategy for 
developing its position in the information communications market 
within the year and is especially focusing on measures to boost 
Teleway Japan's operations.  (Tokyo ASAHI SHIMBUN 1 Jun 94 p 12) 

   MPT Limits NTT Participation in Handiphone Market To Nurture 
Competition -- The 16 June NIHON KEZAI SHIMBUN (NIKKEI) reported 
that the Ministry of Posts and Telecommunications (MPT) decided not 
to approve Nippon Telegraph and Telephone's (NTT) participation in 
the market for next-generation personal handiphone communications 
systems (PHS) as part of NTT's main business operations.  The MPT, 
however, will allow NTT to participate in the market via a separate, 
independent company because it wants to create an even competition 
among NTT, existing companies such as Dainidenden, and new entrants 
to the market. 

   The MPT felt that NTT's operational base, which it established 
when it was a public enterprise, would give the company an edge in 
developing new businesses such as the PHS and, as a result, NTT 
would have a monopoly in the new market and competing companies 
could not evolve.  One of the MPT's main concerns is that the PHS 
requires an extensive network of transmitting stations placed at 
distances from 100 to 500 meters apart.  NTT has the advantage 
because it can place these types of stations atop its 170,000 
public telephone booths and on its 12 million telephone poles 
nationwide.  Other companies would have to rent spaces on top of 
buildings and establish new sites for their transmitting stations 
and would not be able to compete because of the extra costs. 

   The decision is part of a measure to restrain expansion of NTT's 
main operations and will also influence discussions regarding the 
scheduled MPT review of the company's operational structure in 1995. 
It may also lead to other measures to restrict NTT participation in 
the multimedia application software market.  (Tokyo NIHON KEIZAI 
SHIMBUN 16 Jun 94 p 1) 

   New Common Carriers Will Lead the Handiphone Market -- According 
to another article appearing in the 16 June NIKKEI, recent 
developments indicate that the new common carrier telephone 
companies will be the leading force in PHS commercialization efforts 
even though NTT has also begun similar efforts.  There is a strong 
desire among the new common carriers to use PHS-related business 
activities as a "trump card" against the giant NTT.  This is 
especially true for the long-distance carriers which pay close to 50 
percent of their revenues to NTT for accessing its network and reap 
limited returns in subscriber revenues because of the limited number 
of circuits and low capacity.  The PHS business is appealing to 
communications businesses because it has the potential to develop 
into an alternative to the existing NTT network.  If the service 
area for PHS units expands, there is a high probability that 
consumers will be switching away from the NTT domestic urban 
network.  (Tokyo NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN 16 Jun 94 p 13) 

   CHINA:  Domestic Developments - Ministry of Machine Building 
Plans To Develop Auto Industry --  The Ministry of Machine Building 
recently formulated a three-stage development plan for the 
automobile industry.  During the first stage from 1994 to 1996, 
total investment in the auto industry will exceed 46.4 billion yuan, 
an annual average increase of 36 percent.  The state will strive to 
reduce enterprise production costs and prices for passenger cars. 
Investment in the spare parts industry will also be increased. 
During the second stage from 1997 to 2000, annual auto output will 
be 150,000-240,000 and total investment will exceed 99.2 billion 
yuan.  The major focus of production will be on economical cars.  A 
few automobile enterprise groups will be set up and products will be 
developed that can compete on the open market.  During the third 
stage from 2000 to 2010, total investment will be 43 billion yuan 
and the annual increase in auto output will be about 3 million. 
(Harbin HEILONGJIANG RIBAO 20 May 94 p 7) 

   State Commissions Formulate Automobile Industry Policy --  The 
State Planning Commission, State Economic and Trade Commission, and 
the Ministry of Machine-Building Industry recently formulated 
"Policies on Automobile Industrial Technology." The main points are: 

   1.  The state will support automobile enterprises efforts in 
establishing their own development and research organizations and 
forming their own product development capability by absorbing 
foreign technology.  The state will provide funds to enterprise 
groups to jointly develop large research projects. 

   2.  The state will popularize the use of vehicles that employ 
electronic and new technology, are fuel efficient, and have low 
pollution levels.  The state will also encourage research and 
development of new types of fuel and power for vehicles. 

   3.  Automobile enterprises must ensure that their products are 
advanced.  Improvement of current products and development of new 
products must attain the 1990 international level and technology 
imports must meet 1990 international levels. 

   4.  Prior to the year 2000, passenger vehicles and pick-up trucks 
weighing less than 3.15 tons must gradually be converted to use 
gasoline rated at 90 octane or more.  Passenger vehicles weighing 
less than two tons must use unleaded gas.  Passenger vehicles 
exceeding five tons and pick-up trucks produced after the year 2000 
must use diesel fuel. 

   5.  The state will support the establishment of a national-level 
research, testing, and inspection organization for automobiles and 
motorcyles that will be responsible for formulating standards, 
product certification, establishing examination procedures for 
imports and exports, and related tasks.  The state will encourage 
automobile enterprises to set up joint ventures and technology 
research and development corporations with foreigners. 

   6. The state will encourage automobile enterprises to use modern 
electronic technolgy, software processing equipment, and automated 
equipment to raise the per capita equipment utilization rate and 
equipment technology levels. (Shenyang LIAONING JINGJI RIBAO 13 May 
94 p 3) 

   Hainan Company To Exploit Gas Reserves in South China Sea -- A 
large joint-stock company based in Haikou will soon be set up 
comprising petroleum enterprises from Hainan Island and the mainland 
to accelerate natural gas exploration in the South China Sea.  The 
gas reserves in this area (estimated at 100 billion cubic meters) 
are considered to be the largest in the country.  The Western Nanhai 
Sea Company is the leading sponsor with fixed assets of 4 billion 
renminbi.  The Eastern Nanhai Sea Company under the China National 
Offshore Oil Corporation, the Natural Gas Utilization Company, the 
China Offshore Petroleum and Natural Gas Sales Company, and the 
Hainan Trust and Investment Company are also involved.  Investments 
of $1.25 billion have already been made in this area and natural gas 
is expected to be supplied to Hainan Island and Hong Kong in January 
1996.  (Beijing ZHONGGUO XINWEN SHE 1324 GMT 20 Jun 94) 

   MPCC Plans To Be Largest PRC Oil Refinery by Year 2000 -- Sinopec 
Maoming Petrochemical Corporation (MPCC) has announced a $2.3 
billion development program to turn itself into the largest oil 
refining and petrochemical complex in China by the year 2000.  MPCC 
is already the biggest oil refiner in China with an annual capacity 
of 8.5 million tons.  The corporation plans to have an annual 
capacity of 13.5 million tons by 1996 and 17 million tons by the end 
of the century when it will be the largest oil refining center in 
Asia.  MPCC will build four more oil refineries at a total cost of 
$574.7 million.  Construction of two refineries will start later 
this year, while the other two will be completed in 1996.  Foreign 
oil firms that are showing interest in cooperating with MPCC include 
Amoco Corp of the United States, Agip of Italy, and Chia Tai of 
Thailand.  MPCC is also in the process of building a 300,000-ton 
ethylene plant at a cost of $1.4 billion, financed in part with 
$723 million in foreign loans.  Construction of the plant began in 
late 1992 and it will produce 800,000 tons of petrochemical products 
annually from June 1996.  Most of its advanced equipment will be 
imported from the West.  Forty percent of the investment belongs to 
MPCC while the remainder lies with the China International 
Petrochemcical Corporation.  Later this year, MPCC will begin the 
construction of another depot and two oil wharves in Fangcheng, 
Guangxi Zhuang Autonomous Region.  These facilities are needed 
because MPCC now supplies oil products to seven provinces and 
regions in southwest China. (Beijing CHINA DAILY (BUSINESS WEEKLY) 
12-18 Jun 94 p 5) 

   Foreign Trade and Investment - Heilongjiang's Suifenhe Signs 
Trade Contracts With Russia -- A trade delegation from Suifenhe 
signed three contracts worth $1.15 billion with Russia at the Harbin 
trade fair on 16 June.  These include two barter trade contracts and 
one contract for processing supplied materials.  One barter trade 
contract concerns importing timber, steel products, chemical 
fertilizers, and nonferrous metals, and exporting foodstuffs and 
beverages.  The other calls for exporting garments and foodstuffs 
and importing logs.  (Harbin Heilongjiang Radio 0000 GMT 17 Jun 94) 

   Heilongjiang Firms Signs Joint-Venture Project With Russia -- On 
20 June, the Heilongjiang International Engineering Technology 
Cooperation Company and a company in the Zhuhai Special Economic 
Zone jointly signed a contract with a Russian company to establish 
an aerial tourist company in Zhuhai.  The total investment is $2.06 
million.  The Chinese side will provide 52 percent.   The company 
will be involved in selling aerial technology, leasing, tourism, 
advertisement, aerial photography, and aerial surveys.  The 
contracted period is 15 years.  (Harbin Heilongjiang Radio 1000 GMT 
20 Jun 94) 

   Heilongjiang Company Signs Barter Trade Contract With Russia -- 
The Heilongjiang International Economic and Trade Company signed a 
barter trade contract with a trading company of Blagoveshchensk, 
Russia at the Harbin trade fair on 19 June.  Heilongjiang will 
export instant noodles and canned food to Russia and import chemical 
fertilizers. The contract is worth $10 million.  (Harbin 
Heilongjiang Radio 1000 GMT 19 Jun 94) 

   Hong Kong Firm in Joint Venture to Rebuild Guangdong Highways -- 
Hong Kong's Guangzhou Enterprise (Group) and Guangdong's Xinfeng 
County have signed a contract to jointly invest 110 million yuan to 
rebuild the Xinfeng sections of National Highway 105 and Provincial 
Highway 1912.  The firms involved are the Guangdong Provincial 
Xinfeng Highway Development General Company and Xiangjie Limited, 
which is a wholly owned subsidiary of Guangzhou Enterprise (Group). 
The two sides have an equal share in the joint venture, which will 
run for 25 years.  Reconstruction of this section of National 
Highway 105 is expected to be completed by the end 1994 and that of 
Provincial Highway 1912 by the mid-1995.  (Hong Kong TA KUNG PAO 4 
Jun 94 p 5) 

   Guangzhou Wharf Project Being Handled by Hong Kong Firms -- 
According to Kuo Pei-Nan, vice chairman of the board of directors 
and concurrently general manager of Hong Kong-based Guangzhou 
Investment, his company and Stanley Ho's Shun Tak Holdings will take 
the lead in developing Guangzhou's Zhoutouzui Wharf.  Each will have 
35 percent stake in the project and their combined investment in the 
first phase is 500 to 600 million yuan.  The wharf will be 
redeveloped into a complex including an international pier, a 
commercial and entertainment center, and residential buildings.  Kuo 
also said that Guangzhou Investment has also signed a letter of 
intent to invest 200 million yuan in the Nanfang Cement Plant on the 
outskirts of Guangzhou to increase the plant's annual output from 
160,000 tons to 400,000 tons.  (Hong Kong TA KUNG PAO 4 Jun 94 p 14) 

   Hong Kong Firm To Develop Guangzhou Housing Project -- Huang 
Kaiwen, director of the Guangzhou City Land and Property 
Administrative Bureau, recently disclosed that Hong Kong's Cheung 
Kong (Holdings) Ltd., New World Development, and Guangzhou 
Investment signed a letter of intent on a "Home Ownership Plan" with 
the Guangzhou City Government last October.  Low-cost residential 
housing occupying 5 million square meters of land and with a total 
floor space of 7.5 million square meters will be built in the Baiyun 
District of northern Guangzhou.  Total investment will reach HK $20 
billion.  Cheung Kong has 35 percent stake in the project, as does 
New World Development, while Guangzhou Investment has a 20 percent 
stake and the Guangzhou City Government 10 percent.  (Hong Kong TA 
KUNG PAO 7 Jun 94 p 5) 

   Hong Kong Firm Invests in Fuzhou Housing Project -- According to 
Li Yichun, director of the Fuzhou Land Management Bureau of Fujian's 
Fuzhou City, the early stage of a project to protect and transform 
"three lanes and seven alleys" in Fuzhou has been completed.  The 
demolition of houses on more than 50 mu of land has been completed, 
prospecting work is under way, and pile-driving and construction 
will soon begin.  Hong Kong's Cheung Kong (Holdings) Ltd. and the 
Fuhui Ornament Company will invest a total of 3.5 billion yuan.  The 
project covers a total of 661 mu of land, is divided into six 
phases, and is expected to be completed in eight to 12 years.  By 
the end of April this year, Cheung Kong had invested more than 400 
million yuan in the project.  According to a senior manager with the 
joint venture, in the first stage, four blocks with over 1,000 
residential units and two blocks of 16-story office buildings are 
scheduled for sale in six months.  The whole project includes the 
construction of 29 blocks of high-rise residential buildings, six 
blocks of high-class office buildings and apartments, five large 
commercial and trade centers, entertainment centers, and social 
clubs.  (Hong Kong ZHONGGUO TONGXUN SHE 0920 GMT 13 Jun 94) 

   Bavarian Bank Sets Up Business Center in Shanghai -- The German 
state of Bavaria is teaming up with its bank Bayerische Landesbank 
to set up a business center in Shanghai to help German companies 
establish joint ventures.  The center, which opens next month, will 
assist medium-sized companies from all over Germany despite the fact 
that its major backers are Bavarian.  Bayerische Landesbank and 
Deutsche Bank will play an increasingly active role in funding their 
compatriots and others in mainland deals.  General manager Volker 
Stoeckel said that Bayerische Landesbank played a part in building 
10 power plants in southern China, underwriting smaller diesel- 
fueled stations costing $30 to $50 million, of which the bank 
usually invests $10 million itself.  (Hong Kong EASTERN EXPRESS 22 
Jun 94 p 34) 

   Netherlands' Largest Bank Opens Shanghai Branch -- ABN AMRO Bank, 
the largest bank in the Netherlands, expanded its presence in China 
by opening a branch in Shanghai on 8 June.  Bank vice chairman 
Michael Drabbe said that the Shanghai branch will form the base for 
ABN AMRO to build a network in China.  The bank already has a 
representative office in Beijing and is applying to open a similar 
office in Guangzhou.  Branches are planned for other commercial and 
financial centers in China.  The Shanghai branch has been in trial 
operation since last November.  It will concentrate on corporate 
finance, trade finance, loans, deposits, and international payments. 
It has already arranged and been lead manager for three large 
syndicated loans to China, including a $50-million loan for the 
Waigaoqiao Power Plant in Shanghai's Pudong New Area and a $36- 
million loan for the West Pacific Petrochemical Company in Dalian. 
"We do not want to be a large bank in China overnight," Drabbe said, 
"but we are here to stay."  With a network of over 1,800 branches in 
more than 60 countries, ABN AMRO has one of the most extensive 
banking networks in the world.  Its total assets place it among the 
seven largest banks in Europe and the 17th largest in the world. 
(Beijing CHINA DAILY (BUSINESS WEEKLY) 12-18 Jun 94 p 3) 

   Taiwan Group Signs Pharmaceutical Agreement With Beijing Firm -- 
Taiwan's Taifeng Group has signed an agreement with Beijing's 
Tongrentang to invest 300 million yuan in setting up the Beijing 
Tongrentang Taifeng Pharmaceutical Company Limited simultaneously on 
both sides of the strait.  The factory in Taiwan will be set up in 
Zhanghua.  Taiwan's Taifeng Group has become the sole agent for 
Beijing Tongrentang, which has been established for over 300 years, 
and may use its trademark for 20 years.  Although Beijing 
Tongrentang did not provide any capital for the joint venture, it 
holds 25 percent of the stake.  It can share in the distribution of 
dividends but does not have to take responsibility for losses or for 
the distribution of fixed assets after termination of the venture. 
(Hong Kong ZHONGGUO TONGXUN SHE 0832 GMT 16 Jun 94) 

   Guangdong's Huizhou Builds Joint Venture Container Production 
Base -- Huizhou laid the foundation stone for its first Sino-foreign 
container production base, lifting the curtain on construction of 
the Wuyangfu Industrial City, which covers an area of 3 square km 
and involves a total investment of 5 billion yuan.  There will be 25 
projects in the first phase, including the container company, and a 
motorcycle plant with an output value of 4 billion yuan and an 
expected 2 billion yuan in profits and taxes a year.  When the whole 
city is completed, it is estimated that output value will exceed 8 
billion yuan and profits and taxes, 5 billion yuan.  The container 
company will import advanced equipment from the ROK, the United 
States, Japan, and Germany, and produce international standard 
twenty foot equivalent units.  The ROK will be responsible for 
exporting and marketing 100 percent of the goods during the first 5 
years.  Total investment in the project, covering 110,000 square 
meters, amounts to $20 million.  Once operational, the company will 
be able to produce 24,000 containers, with a total output value of 
$60 million and a net profit of $6 million.  It is estimated that 
total investment can be recovered within three and a half years. 
The project is expected to go into operation on 19 December. 
(Beijing ZHONGGUO XINWEN SHE 1032 GMT 12 Jun 94) 

   Thai Group Shows Interest in Shenzhen Subway -- Thailand's 
Jinwanli Group signed a letter of intent with Shenzhen regarding 
investment in and the operation of the first phase project of 
Shenzhen's Subway Line No. 1.  The line, which will be 25 km long 
with 22 stations, will run from Luohu Railway Station to the Nantou 
Inspection Post.  The project, which involves an investment of $1.8 
billion, is expected to start in 1995 and completion is expected in 
4 years.  A feasibility study has been made and the proposal has 
been submitted to the State Planning Commission for examination and 
approval.  According to the letter of intent, the Thai group will be 
responsible for accumulating the funds, completing the project on 
schedule, and operating the subway for a set number of years.  (Hong 
Kong WEN WEI PO 4 Jun 94 p A6) 

   Australian Businessmen Sign 335 Letters of Intent for Cooperation 
-- The deputy director of the American and Oceanian Affairs 
Department of the Chinese Ministry of Foreign Trade and Economic 
Cooperation, Shi Jianxin, has revealed that 335 letters of intent 
involving investment of $3.96 billion were recently signed at the 
"Seminar on Trade and Investment in China" in Sydney.  The 100- 
strong Chinese delegation sought investment in Melbourne and Sydney 
between 1 and 8 June, offering 519 projects worth $7 billion.  Most 
of the cooperation projects involve infrastructure, including power 
plants, highways, railroads, bridges, and manufacturing industries 
covering metallurgy, chemicals, machinery, food processing, 
textiles, agriculture, animal husbandry, electronics, electrical 
appliances, and building materials.  (Beijing ZHONGGUO XINWEN SHE 
1250 GMT 9 Jun 94) 

   Heilongjiang State Farms Introduce Foreign Capital -- 
Heilongjiang state farms have used foreign capital to improve 
farming. They have established economic and technical cooperative 
relations with more than 20 countries, including the United States, 
Japan, Canada, ROK, and CIS, and introduced $250 million of foreign 
capital, including $70 in World Bank loans and $50 million in 
foreign bank loans.  (Harbin Heilongjiang Radio 1000 GMT 18 Jun 
94) 

   Taiwan:  International Commercial Bank To Return To Ho Chi Minh 
City -- The Ministry of Finance said on 10 June it has approved the 
upgrading of China International Commercial Bank's (CICB) 
representative office in Ho Chi Minh City to a branch office.  The 
CICB ceased operations after the Vietnamese communists took Saigon 
in 1975.  This will be the first time the bank has  operated in Ho 
Chi Minh City since 1975.  The Vietnamese Government has agreed to 
cancel all the past rights of claim belonging to and debts incurred 
by the CICB in Vietnam.  The CICB has yet to file an application 
with the Central Bank of Vietnam for permission to upgrade its 
representative office to a branch bank status.  (Taipei CHING-CHI 
JIH-PAO 11 Jun 94 p 6) 

   Total Industrial Output Expected To Double in Eight Years -- 
According to the "White Paper on Taiwan's Industrial Policy for the 
Coming Decade," which was compiled by the Economic Affairs 
Ministry's Industrial Consultation Committee, Taiwan's total 
industrial output will maintain an annual growth rate of 6 percent 
to reach $320 billion by the year 2002, almost doubling the present 
value of $188 billion.  It is estimated that high technology 
industries will turn out 60 percent of products in the future. 
While the textile industry will remain Taiwan's largest industry, 
with its output value topping $34.6 billion by 2002, the machinery, 
automobile, consumer electronics, pharmaceutical, and petrochemical 
sectors will emerge as future star industries following a doubling 
of their output.  Although the information industry will be the 
fastest growing industry, with its output increasing to $25 billion 
from $8 billion at present, the petrochemical industry will draw the 
greatest interest from domestic investors.  (Taipei CHING-CHI JIH- 
PAO 3 Jun 94 p 1) 

   Overseas Investment Adversely Affects Domestic Tax Revenues -- 
Director of the Taxation Bureau Lin Chien-hsiung said recently that 
investment by Taiwan businesses abroad has adversely affected tax 
revenues at home, adding that the taxation bureau will adopt proper 
measures to deal with this situation.  The bureau will find out why 
Taiwan businesses keep their profits abroad for long periods of 
time.  According to the director, Taiwan's tax revenues from 
business profits amounted to $4.07 billion a few years ago, about 
the same as personal income tax and business tax, but in 1993 total 
business tax rose to $6.255 billion while business profits tax 
dropped to U.S. $3.948 billion.  (Taipei CHING-CHI JIH-PAO 13 Jun 94 
p 2) 

   NORTH KOREA:  Increased Use of Silicate Bricks Noted -- According 
to the 17 May NODONG SINMUN, in recent years, about 50,000 silicate 
brick houses have been built in North Korea, of which 35,000 are 
located in farming villages.  The 19 May NAEWOE TONGSIN cited an 
article from CHOSON SINBO--a publication of Chosen Soren 
(Association of Korean Residents in Japan)--stating that out of 
80,000 new houses built in Pyongyang, about 18,000 were built with 
silicate bricks.  Silicate brick houses preserve heat better and are 
more durable than cement block houses, the article said.  In 
addition, the silicate brick production process is reportedly so 
simple that bricks can be produced quickly and in large quantities, 
using sand and quicklime or slaked lime.  Currently, there are 
silicate brick factories in Anju in South Pyongan Province, Pihyon 
in North Pyongan Province, and Hamhung in North Hamgyong Province. 

   NAEWOE pointed out that increased use of silicate bricks may be 
the result of a cement shortage in the country.  The publication 
noted that North Korea came "far short" of meeting its production 
goal of 22 million tons of cement under the Third Seven-Year Plan. 
Moreover, most of the cement produced in North Korea is for export 
to Southeast Asia and the Middle East, leading to a "serious" cement 
shortage in the construction sector. 

   SOUTH KOREA:  FEATURE:  ROK Moving 'Full Scale' Into Next- 
Generation Displays -- SUMMARY:  ROK conglomerates are investing 
heavily in liquid crystal display (LCD) technology and manufacturing 
equipment to reduce their dependence on Japanese imports and secure 
a competitive position in this next-generation electronics field, 
according to Seoul press reports.  Samsung is building the country's 
first LCD color filter plant and has made organizational changes 
that will allow the group to focus on this sector.  Both Samsung and 
Orion will realize early production of LCD-related items through 
technical tieups with Toshiba.  Some $2.5 billion will be invested 
totally in LCD's by top South Korean firms through 1998. 

   South Korea's four largest electronics manufacturers are 
investing "full scale" in liquid crystal display development while 
taking other steps to secure a competitive international position in 
this "next-generation" sector by the second half of the decade. 
According to the 26 May MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN, Samsung Group is 
developing 9.4-inch thin film transistor (TFT) LCD's for notebook 
personal computers (PC's).  It reportedly began building a plant at 
the end of last year to mass produce the item by early 1995. 

   The same newspaper reported on 13 May that Samsung is making 
organizational changes to allow its electronics-related subsidiaries 
to concentrate more fully on individual product types.  Samsung 
Electronics has been developing the 9.4-inch TFT color units, but 
will transfer production by the end of 1995 to Samsung Display 
Devices (formerly Samsung Electron Devices), which at present 
manufactures only twisted nematic (TN) and super-twisted nematic 
(STN) LCD's.  The latter subsidiary in turn will cede production of 
monitors to Samsung Electronics, computers to Samsung Data Systems, 
and deflecting coils (used in monitors) to Samsung Electro- 
Mechanics.  According to the newspaper, Samsung Display Systems will 
have invested 500 billion won ($625 million) by 1998 to expand its 
share of the world's TFT-LCD market to 7-8 percent. 

   In addition, the 7 June MAEIL KYONGJE reported that Samsung 
Corning will spend 60 billion won ($75 million) on a factory in 
Suwon to manufacture color filters for TFT-LCD's, which when 
completed in June 1995 will have an annual output of 1.5 million 10- 
inch filters.  According to the paper, South Korean manufacturers 
have been entirely dependent on Japan for these filters.  As Samsung 
and other ROK companies gear up to produce TFT-LCD's as next- 
generation replacements for cathode ray tubes by 1995, demand for 
this "core component" is expected to rise sharply.  Although the 
June MAEIL KYONGJE article stated that local production of TFT-LCD's 
would reduce South Korea's dependence on Japan, earlier articles 
from the same newspaper nevertheless identified at least two avenues 
of Japanese support for Samsung's LCD program, namely, Samsung 
Display Devices' plan to set up a "research institute" in Japan to 
obtain LCD technology (MAEIL KYONGJE 8 Nov 93) and Samsung's 
agreement with Toshiba to "jointly develop" LCD integrated circuits 
(MAEIL KYONGJE 28 Dec 93). 

   Meanwhile, Orion Electric Co., a subsidiary of the Daewoo Group, 
is investing 91 billion won ($113.75 million) in a factory to 
produce color LCD's for notebook PC's, according to the 4 June MAEIL 
KYONGJE.  The plant will produce 840,000 9.5-inch color STN-LCD's 
annually and another 12 million TN and small-to-medium STN-LCD's. 
The same paper's 26 May issue gave a lower annual production figure 
of 720,000 9.5-inch color units by 1995 and added that the company 
will invest another 350 billion won ($437.5 million) into TFT-LCD 
production equipment from 1995. 

   Although other domestic firms have developed prototype color STN- 
LCD's, Orion will be the first South Korean company to mass produce 
them, thanks to a technology transfer agreement the company signed 
with Toshiba in March 1993, according to the 4 June MAEIL KYONGJE. 
Orion's new "in-line equipment" will produce four LCD surfaces on 
each glass substrate wafer in a clean room "with a degree of purity 
under 100."  The paper noted that color LCD's for notebook PC's had 
been available only through Japanese companies such as Toshiba, 
Sharp, and NEC and that Orion's production is expected to save the 
ROK 120 billion won ($150 million) annually in import costs. 

   Finally, the 26 May MAEIL KYONGJE reported that Goldstar is 
developing 9.5-inch TFT-LCD's for notebook PC's, and 5.6-inch units 
for portable televisions.  The company will invest 300 billion won 
($375 million) in production facilities by 1995 and spend another 
200 billion won ($250 million) betwen 1996-97 to increase production 
capacity to 1 million units annually.  Hyundai this year will expand 
its production facilities for small and medium color STN-LCD's and 
work out plans to build larger units.  The company reportedly will 
have a TFT-LCD line finished by the end of 1995, that will be able 
to produce prototypes.  Hyundai will spend 460 billion won ($575 
million) on this item alone between 1995-98. 

   MAEIL KYONGJE also noted that Samsung, Orion, Goldstar, and 
Hyundai will invest a total of about two trillion won ($2.5 billion) 
in LCD's by 1998, in anticipation of a world market that will grow 
from $8.4 billion in 1995 to $15 billion by the year 2000. 

   Ministries Differ on How To Revise Communications Industry -- 
Friction is growing between the Ministry of Trade, Industry, and 
Energy (MOTIE) and the Ministry of Communications (MOC) over who 
will take the lead in the information and communications industry. 
On 6 June, the MOTIE-affiliated Korea Institute for Industrial 
Economics and Trade (KIET) released a proposal for restructuring the 
communications industry.  KIET's proposal differs greatly from one 
presented in April by the Communications Development Research 
Institute, an affiliate of the MOC.  In its proposal, KIET suggests 
shifting from the current system of designating key communications 
businesses to a licensing system.  KIET's proposal would allow 
communications service providers to freely participate in the 
industry and allow businesses with their own communications 
facilities to operate them commercially.  However, the 
communications institute fears that abolishing restrictions would 
lead to problems of vertical integration.  It does not want 
businesses with communications facilities to participate in the 
overall industry.  The MOC plans to prepare its amendment for 
presentation to the National Assembly in September.  (Seoul 
MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN 7 Jun 94 p 1) 

   In general the amendments proposed by KIET and the communications 
institute have a common starting point and share similar views on 
some issues.  However, the two institutes differ on the issue of 
qualification standards and on the amount of participation various 
businesses may have.  The following is an overview of the main 
points of contention, the current system, and the revisions proposed 
by the institutes. 

   Enterprise's framework -- Current system:  Enterprises are 
divided into two categories.  A. Key communications enterprises-- 
general (city phone service, etc.) and special (mobile telecom, 
etc.)  B. Value-added service providers--use general communications 
enterprises' equipment 
   The communications institute proposes maintaining the current 
system, with general enterprises owning the communications 
facilities and value-added service providers using those facilities. 
   KIET proposes allowing value-added service providers to use cable 
TV facilities as well as those of general enterprises. 

   Restrictions on participation in key enterprises -- Current 
system:  A.  General enterprises--individual companies are limited 
to a total share of 10 percent, equipment manufacturers are limited 
to a total of 3 percent, and foreign participation is not allowed. 
B. Special enterprises--individual companies are limited to a total 
share of 33 percent; government, equipment manufacturers, etc. are 
limited to a total share of 10 percent; foreigners are limited to a 
total share of 33 percent. 
   The communications institute recognizes the need to relax 
restrictions, but is undecided as to concrete percentage limits. 
   KIET proposes lifting all restrictions on participation for ROK 
entities and determining foreign participation according to the 
outlook for the Uruguay Round agreement. 

   Commercial use of communications facilities -- Current system: 
Companies are prohibited from using their own communications 
facilities for "outside purposes." 
   The communications institute proposes continuing the current 
system, while allowing enterprises with such facilities to offer 
limited communications services. 
   KIET proposes abolishing the current system and allowing 
companies to use their communications facilities for commercial 
purposes.  (Seoul MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN 7 Jun 94 p 3) 

   New Laser Has Applications in Semiconductors, Diagnostic 
Equipment -- The Korea Advanced Institute of Science and Technology 
(KAIST, a ROK Government-funded research institute within the 
Ministry of Science and Technology) has developed a high-energy 
laser with potential applications in semiconductors, nuclear fusion, 
and a variety of medical and diagnostic equipment.  Developed by 
KAIST's Laser Science Research Center, the device reportedly 
produces 2 trillion watts of power.  In terms of technological 
sophistication, the development puts South Korea within the ranks of 
the 10 most advanced nations in laser research. 

   KAIST began working on high-energy lasers in 1988 and has 
invested 730 million won ($912,500) in their development.  The 
present device is made up of a master oscillator, a reamplifier, and 
a five-stage main amplifier.  The length from the main oscillator to 
final output is 40 meters and the beam at final output is 9 mm in 
diameter.  Based on neodymium-glass, the laser has 80 joules of 
energy at a wave length of 40 trillionths of a second. 

   The laser will make it possible for South Korea to develop its 
own X-ray lithography technology needed for next-generation one 
giga-DRAM chip memory elements with line definitions of only 0.15 
microns.  It will also have applications in genetic engineering, 
medicine, and optics, including X-ray microscopes and holograms. 
KAIST will begin work immediately on a device with a seven-stage 
amplifier that produces ten trillion watts of power.  (Seoul MAEIL 
KYONGJE SINMUN 8 June 94 p 57) 

   Auto Technology Imports Up Average of 6.6 Percent Since 199O -- 
The South Korean auto industry imported 85 different auto 
technologies in 1993, six more than in 1992.  The number of imported 
technologies has risen an average of 6.6 percent annually since 
1990.  The industry imported 42 technologies (or 49.4 percent) from 
Japan, 12 (14.1 percent) from the United States, 11 (12.9 percent) 
from England, and seven (8.2 percent) from Germany.  ROK companies 
have allowed $190 million for royalties, excluding fees for ordinary 
technologies.  Most of the royalties went to Germany ($102.8 
million, or 53.9 percent), while $57.67 million (30.2 percent) went 
to Japan, $16.55 million (8.7 percent) to England, and $5.53 million 
(2.9 percent) to the United States.  Finished automobile 
manufacturers accounted for 39 of the imported technologies.  For 
example, Daewoo Motors imported 13 technologies, Asia Motors seven, 
Hyundai and Kia four each, and Ssangyong Motors three.  Samsung, 
which wants to enter the car manufacturing industry, also imported 
four technologies from Japan's Nissan.  (Seoul KUKMIN ILBO 21 May 94 
p 6) 

   Government Stresses Labor-Management Cooperation -- At a meeting 
held on 23 May to discuss the "new economy" development plan, 
President Kim Yong-sam stressed the importance of a "harmonious" 
labor-management working relationship, saying that "without it, we 
will not be able to improve our national competitiveness and attract 
overseas investment."  To bolster his message, the ROK president has 
ordered the Ministry of Trade, Industry, and Energy (MOTIE) and the 
Ministry of Labor to set up offices dedicated to promoting labor- 
management cooperation.  (Seoul HANGUK ILBO 24 May 94 p 4) 

   MOTIE and other government agencies will reportedly formulate 
policies providing incentives such as tax breaks and other 
exemptions to companies that promote cooperative labor-management 
relations.  For example, companies that offer company stocks and 
bonds to their employees will be granted a tax break.  (Seoul 
HANGYORE SINMUN 24 May 94 p 7) 

   Government Advocates Creation of Regional Economic Body -- The 
ROK Government plans to push for the creation of an economic body 
favoring economic development in Northeast Asia.  As envisioned by 
the government, South Korea, Japan, China, and North Korea would 
form the "main body," with South Korea being at the very center of 
the organization.  The government will form a special committee that 
will draw up a blueprint to renovate and develop airports, harbors, 
and train and truck terminals to meet international standards.  The 
committee will also assist the country's key industries in getting 
ready for regional and international scale operations.  Although the 
overall plan is only in the preliminary stage, the government has 
already decided to compile all statistical data in accordance with 
OECD (the Organization of Economic Construction and Development) 
standards.  (Seoul HANGYORE SINMUN 28 May 94 p 7) 

   Reimports of Electronics From China Increasing -- In the first 
four months of this year, ROK companies reimported $95.16 million 
worth of electronics products from China, an increase of 58.9 
percent over the same period in 1993.  The increase follows ROK 
firms' moves to set up two-tiered production, in which low-value 
products are produced in China and high-value and high-tech products 
are produced domestically.  The reimports included $53.13 million 
worth of electronics parts (an increase of 69.1 percent), $12.72 
million worth of finished industrial electronics products (an 
increase of 22.4 percent), and $29.3 million worth of finished 
household electronics (an increase of 62.5 percent).  With regard to 
electronic parts, reimports of integrated circuits alone increased 
400 percent, totaling $3.16 million.  Recently ROK investment in 
China in the area of finished electronics products has increased, 
therefore imports of finished electronics products from China are 
also expected to increase significantly in the future.  (Seoul 
HANGUK KYONGJE SINMUN 6 Jun 94 p 9) 

   Kia To Export $40 Million Worth of Car Parts to Japan -- Kia 
Motor Company will begin shipping $40 million worth of compact car 
parts to Japan's Mazda in July.  South Korea exported $76 million of 
car parts to Japan last year and $24 million in the first four 
months of this year.  Mazda decided to order car parts from Kia 
because the strong yen has rapidly weakened the international 
competitiveness of its finished cars.  Meanwhile, Kia intends to 
develop other parts for export, in case the yen remains strong. 
(Seoul MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN 14 Jun 94 p 10) 

   Daewoo To Export Armored Cars to Malaysia -- Daewoo Heavy 
Industries recently announced it will export 22 armored cars worth 
$13 million to Malaysia.  This will be the second shipment to 
Malaysia, following last year's shipment of 42 armored cars.  (Seoul 
TONGA ILBO 18 Jun 94 p 10) 

   ROK To Begin 'Officially' Exporting Cars to China -- During talks 
held on 9 June between Wu Yi, China's foreign trade and economic 
cooperation minister, and her ROK counterpart, Kim Chol-su, it was 
announced that China will "officially" import ROK cars for the first 
time.  Minister Wu said that a barter-trade contract will soon be 
signed between Daewoo Corporation and the China Machinery Import and 
Export General Bureau.  Under the contract, Daewoo will exchange 
5,000 of its passenger cars for Chinese corn and machinery parts. 
Another ROK car manufacturer, Hyundai Motors, is also negotiating 
with China to export its cars through official channels.  (Seoul 
HANGYORE SINMUN 10 Jun 94 p 2) 

   Asia Cement To Enter China's Market -- Asia Cement has concluded 
a joint venture agreement with China's Dalian Second Cement to build 
a concrete plant.  The new venture has a total paid-in capital of 
$579 million.  The plant will be able to produce 200,000 cubic 
meters of mixed concrete annually and will be equipped with modern 
environmental devices.  (Seoul MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN 11 Jun 94 p 8) 

   Undersea Optical Cable Link to Russia To Be Completed in 1995 -- 
Korea Telecom recently announced that construction of an undersea 
optical cable to link South Korea, Russia, and Japan had begun in 
Pusan.  Work is scheduled to be completed by January 1995.  Dubbed 
the "R-J-K undersea optical cable," the 1,717-km cable has a 
capacity of 15,000 communication lines.  South Korea will shoulder 
22 percent or 80 billion won ($100 million) of the construction 
costs.  (Seoul MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN 14 Jun 94 p 16) 

   Hyundai Precision To Introduce Technology From Germany -- Hyundai 
Precision plans to introduce technology from Germany to produce 
vertical machining centers.  The technology will help diversify 
Hyundai's production of machine tools.  Hyundai has agreed to pay 
the German company supplying the technology 3 percent of its net 
sales, in addition to an up-front payment of 500,000 marks 
($315,000).  (Seoul MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN 12 Jun 94 p 6) 

   Hyundai To Export 'Accents' to Europe, Middle East, Asia -- 
Hyundai Motor Company will export its four-door Accent passenger car 
to Europe and Asia beginning in June, and to North America beginning 
in July.  It will also export three- and five-door cars to the 
Middle East, Europe, and Asia beginning in August, and to North 
America beginning in September.  Hyundai will increase its 
production capacity from 18,000 cars per month to 33,000 beginning 
in September.  The company will supply 17,000 of the cars produced 
this month to the domestic market.  In July, it will produce 24,500 
cars, exporting 10,500 of them and selling the rest domestically. 
(Seoul MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN 18 Jun 94 p 8) 

   SOUTHEAST ASIA:  BURMA - Hong Kong Securities Firm Establishes 
'Myanmar Fund' -- The Hong Kong firm Kerry Securities has 
established a "Myanmar Fund"  as a vehicle to invest in Burmese 
companies that are "advancing into a market economy," as well as in 
Burmese foreign debt instruments.  The $50-$100 million fund will 
probably be listed on the Dublin Stock Exchange. 

   Kerry Securities is controlled by Robert Kwok, a Malaysian-born 
Overseas Chinese tycoon who also controls the Shangri-La luxury 
hotel chain.  In March 1994, Kwok announced that he will build a 
hotel in Rangoon. 

   Burma has no foreign exchange holdings and because it has been 
late in repaying its debts to the governments of the advanced 
countries and financial institutions, it has no access to new 
government financing or private bank loans.  Thus, Burma must rely 
on direct investment by foreign companies, and the new fund 
apparently is the first example of this type of financing. 

   According to Kerry Securities, the fund's investment objectives 
include investing in Burmese joint ventures with foreign companies, 
investing in government enterprises that are being privatized as 
well as in infrastructure projects, purchasing government debt 
instruments and government and corporate bonds and short-term 
financing.  To diversify risk, no single investment can exceed 20 
percent of the fund's total investment and this limit probably will 
be set even lower, at 10-15 percent.  The fund will be managed by 
Kerry Investment Management, another company in the Kerry corporate 
family.  (Tokyo NIKKEI KINYU SHIMBUN 12 Jun 94 p 1) 

   French Company To Build Gas Turbines at Power Station -- The 
Myanmar Electric Power Enterprise (MEPE) and France's European Gas 
Turbines SA have signed a contract to build three 33-megawatt gas 
turbines at the Ahlone power station to generate additional power 
for Rangoon by the end of the year.  Burma also plans to build 
another 100-megawatt power station in the near future.  (Rangoon THE 
NEW LIGHT OF BURMA 10 Jun 94 p 3) 

   Thai Farmers Bank To Open Resident Office in Rangoon -- The Thai 
Farmers Bank, Thailand's third largest bank, will open a resident 
office in Rangoon, according to Burma's Central Bank.  To date eight 
foreign banks have received permission to open offices in Burma, 
including the Thai Military Bank and the Development Bank of 
Singapore.  (Tokyo NIKKEI KINYU SHIMBUN 12 Jun 94 p 5) 

   INDONESIA:  Indonesia Seeks ROK Participation in Oil Field 
Development -- At a recent press conference in Seoul, Indonesian 
Minister of State for Research and Technology Habibie expressed hope 
that ROK businesses will "actively participate" in expanding 
electricity installations and developing oil fields in Indonesia, 
projects in which Indonesia will invest a total of $61 billion. 
Minister Habibie said that the Indonesian Government will invest $35 
billion in developing the oil fields on the Natuna Islands during an 
eight-month period and $26 billion in expanding electricity 
installations.  (Seoul MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN 19 Jun 94 p 2) 

   P.T. Telkom Launches Global System for Mobile Communications -- 
The state-run telecommunications company P.T. Telkom plans to start 
its Global System for Mobile Communications (GSM) on 1 July in Batam 
island.  GSM, a cellular mobile communication system that works on a 
900-Mhz frequency with digital technology, is the latest in 
communications.  (Jakarta BISNIS INDONESIA 27 May 94 p 6) 

   Trade Agreement With Czech Republic Signed -- Czech Industry and 
Trade Minister Vladimir Dlouhy and Indonesian Trade Minister S.B. 
Joedono recently signed an agreement to strengthen bilateral trade 
relations.  According to Minister Dlouhy, Czech businessmen are 
looking for Indonesian partners to manufacture truck engines for 
export to Egypt, Turkey, China, and North Korea.  In addition, the 
Czech Republic is interested in exporting its Skoda cars to 
Indonesia.  In the past, imports to Indonesia from the Czech 
Republic have included steel, raw material for plastics, machinery 
and equipment for cement factories, glassware, and chemical 
products.  Indonesian exports to the Czech Republic have included 
natural rubber, coffee, plywood, office machinery, furniture, 
telecommunications equipment, and textiles.  (Jakarta MERDEKA 26 May 
94 p 4) 

   Increase in Textile, Garment Exports to Japan Reported -- Doddy 
Sukandar, secretary of the National Agency for Export Development, 
recently stated that textile exports to Japan from January to 
November 1993 reached $446.18 billion, increasing by 2.9 percent 
over the same period in 1992. In addition, garment exports increased 
by 4.8 percent, from $327.98 billion in 1992 to $343.67 billion in 
1993.  According to Sukandar, the market share of Indonesian 
textiles in Japan increased from 2.6 percent to 2.8 percent and that 
of garments from 2.7 percent to 2.8 percent.  (Jakarta THE 
INDONESIA TIMES 9 Jun 94 p 1) 

   Trade Chamber Expects Lower Australian Import Duties -- The 
Indonesian Chamber of Commerce and Industry (Kadin) has expressed 
hope that Australia will lower the import duties imposed on 
Indonesian commodities exported to Australia, with a view to 
boosting trade and improving the balance of trade between the two 
countries.  Aburizal Bakrie, Kadin's president, signed a memorandum 
of understanding with the Australian Chamber of Commerce and 
Industry in Jakarta on 8 June to make adjustments to the tariff and 
nontariff barriers against several Indonesian products.  Bakrie said 
last year that Australia enjoyed a trade surplus of $627 million, 
with total bilateral trade volume reaching $2.17 billion dollars. 
(Jakarta Radio Republik Indonesia Network 0000 GMT 9 Jun 94) 

   LAOS:  Thailand, PRC, Singapore To Establish Trade Complex in 
Laos -- Thailand, the PRC, and Singapore plan to establish a $400- 
million, duty-free trade complex at Don Sai Island, Laos, to be 
called the Golden Triangle Company.  The trade center will be a 
duty-free port with goods supplied by various countries, including 
Laos, Burma, the PRC, and Singapore.  Goods from the PRC will 
include garments, herbal medicines, and farm tools, while products 
from Laos and Burma will consist of silverware, handicrafts, and 
gems.  Singapore will sell electrical appliances and film negatives 
and Thailand will sell miscellaneous products.  The goods will be 
transported along the Mekong River and sold at the trade complex or 
exported to nearby countries.  (Bangkok Voice of Free Asia 1030 GMT 
21 Jun 94) 

   MALAYSIA:  Telekom Malaysia To Establish Joint Venture in Sri 
Lanka -- Telekom Malaysia recently announced that it will operate a 
digital cellular telephone network in Sri Lanka by the end of the 
year.  The joint venture company, MTN Network Ltd., will become the 
fourth cellular network operator in Sri Lanka, but the first to 
offer a digital-based system, using the Global System for Mobile 
Communications (GSMC) standard.  The company will start off with 
10,000 subscribers.  (Kuala Lumpur BERITA HARlAN 24 May 94 p 7) 

   SINGAPORE:  FEATURE:  Electronic Access to Information, Services 
Available By 2000 -- SUMMARY:  Kuala Lumpur and Jakarta papers 
recently reported that Singapore is resolved to become a "push- 
button, electronic city-state" by the year 2000.  The National 
Computer Board envisions a future in which virtually all computers 
will be interconnected and Singaporeans will have electronic access 
to information and services at any time and in any place, the papers 
said. 

   The 17 May Kuala Lumpur BERITA HARlAN reported that Singapore is 
well on its way to becoming a "push-button electronic city-state" by 
the year 2000.  Presently, Singaporeans can already push a few 
buttons on automated bank teller machines to purchase stocks and 
bonds, obtain stock market data from a pocket-size pager, dial for 
health care information, and phone in tax returns on incomes of up 
to $12,000 a year. 
   The 19 May Jakarta BISNIS INDONESIA reported that one in four 
Singapore households owns a computer and 10 percent of them are now 
connected to modems for external communication.  The paper added 
that under the government's "Information Technology 2000" plan, 
virtually all computers in homes, offices, schools, and factories 
will eventually be interconnected.  In addition, the paper noted 
that NCB (National Computer Board) Chief Executive Ko Kheng Hwa's 
vision is to transform Singapore into an "Intelligent Island" where 
people will have access to on-line information and services, any 
time, anywhere.  The NCB projects that by the year 2000, it will be 
technologically feasible for Singaporeans to work, shop, and bank 
from home via an electronic screen and by pushing a few keys or 
using voice commands, according to BERITA HARIAN and BISNIS 
INDONESIA. 

   BERITA HARIAN reported that the NCB is supported by several 
partners in this project, including Singapore Telecom.  It is 
equipped with satellite stations and transoceanic cables and linked 
with BISDN (Broadband Integrated Services Digital Network).  NCB 
Chief Executive Ko said that BISDN can provide more video channels 
and allows a single telephone cable to handle multiple, simultaneous 
transmissions. 

   According to BERITA HARIAN, several new projects will soon be 
under way.  One of them will link local and overseas libraries and 
allow users to access multimedia information databases from their 
homes and offices.  In 1996, Singapore plans to start an electronic 
road pricing (ERP) system for cars entering business districts 
during peak hours.  While motorists driving to Singapore's shopping 
and business districts during peak hours must now purchase a daily 
or monthly permit, in the future, they will need to have a stored- 
value card attached to their vehicles.  BERITA HARlAN also cited 
Ko's prediction that by the end of the decade, Singaporeans will be 
able to touch an icon on a television screen placed at an 
information kiosk to read movie or concert reviews, select seats, 
and purchase tickets electronically. 

   Finally, BERITA HARIAN and BISNIS INDONESIA said that the cost of 
this fast-paced networking operation will be several billion 
dollars.  The two papers noted that last year alone the public and 
private sectors spent about $1.2 billion for computer hardware and 
software, while Singapore Telecom spent more than $280 million for 
telecommunications infrastructures. 

   Singaporean Banks Expanding Into Asia -- Singapore's large banks 
are stepping up their involvement in other Asian countries.  The 
Development Bank of Singapore has had offices in Beijing, Bombay, 
and Rangoon since spring of this year.  It is involved through its 
affiliated companies in the trading industries in Sri Lanka and the 
Philippines and is on the Shanghai and Shenzhen stock exchanges in 
China. 

   Another Singaporean bank, the Overseas-Chinese Banking 
Corporation, with the addition of a Tianjin branch in December 1993, 
now has three branches in China.  The bank has permission to set up 
a representative office in Rangoon, may establish an offshore branch 
in Bangkok, and is considering investing in Indonesian banks and 
moving into Vietnam. 

   The Overseas Union Bank is moving ahead with preparations to 
establish an office in Chengdu, China and has applied for permission 
to open an offshore bank in Bangkok, where it now has a 
representative office.  The bank opened an office in Ho Chi Minh 
City in 1993. 

   The Keppel Bank has received permission to establish a 
representative office in Beijing.  It is preparing to open an office 
in Rangoon and a branch in Vietnam and seeks opportunities to enter 
Bangkok, Manila, Jakarta, and Taipei.  (Tokyo NIKKEI KINYU SHIMBUN 8 
Jun 94 p 5) 

   Increase in 1993 Trade With The Netherlands Reported -- Trade 
between Singapore and the Netherlands amounted to $1.45 billion in 
1993, an increase of 53 percent, according to a Royal Netherlands 
Embassy statement.  Singapore's imports from the Netherlands, 
involving mostly refined oil products, rose 73 percent, while its 
exports to the country rose 37 percent and consisted of computers, 
semiconductors, transistors, and medical equipment.  (Singapore 
BUSINESS TIMES 16 Jun 94 p 2) 

   THAILAND:  Foreign Bank Branches To Be Upgraded -- Five of the 46 
foreign bank branches that provide Bangkok International Banking 
Facility (BIBF) services may be upgraded to full branches by next 
year in line with Thailand's planned liberalization of the financial 
sector, according to Bank of Thailand Governor Wichit Suphinit. 
(Bangkok BANGKOK POST 20 Jun 94 p 21) 

   Electricity Authority To Increase Purchases From Laos -- 
Beginning in September, Thailand will purchase more electricity from 
Laos.  Sombun Maninawa, general manager of the Electricity 
Generating Authority of Thailand (EGAT), recently said that 
electricity from Laos will not cost more than electricity generated 
in Thailand.  EGAT will issue government bonds worth $122 million to 
finance various projects, including the purchase of electricity. 
(Bangkok Radio Thailand Network 0000 GMT 16 Jun 94) 

   State Bank of Vietnam Receives $100-Million Loan -- The state- 
owned Krung Thai Bank and the Export-Import Bank of Thailand 
extended a $100-million loan to the State Bank of Vietnam on 17 
June, marking a new era of financial liberalization.  Prime Minister 
Chuan Likphai said the credit extension is designed to help 
Vietnam's reconstruction.  (Bangkok Radio Thailand Network 0000 GMT 
19 Jun 94) 

   VIETNAM:  FEATURE:  Vietcombank Branching Out, Expanding Services 
-- SUMMARY:  Vietcombank is expanding its services into new, 
consumer-oriented sectors possibly in conjunction with other Asian 
banks, a Tokyo financial newspaper reported.  The bank is also 
broadening its network of domestic and overseas branches and offices 
in response to the country's economic growth and increased dealings 
with foreign companies. 

   Vietnam's largest state-run bank, the Vietnam Foreign Trade Bank 
(also called Vietcombank) will have established financial service 
companies in five sectors by the year 2000, the 12 June Tokyo NIKKEI 
KINYU SHIMBUN reported.  According to the bank's vice-president, 
these sectors include leasing, credit cards, real estate, 
consulting, and non-banks.  The real estate and consulting companies 
will be fully invested subsidiaries of Vietcombank.  Companies in 
the other three sectors will be joint ventures with foreign 
companies. 

   NIKKEI reported that the leasing company in particular could take 
the form of a joint venture with Japan or Singapore.  The paper 
added, however, that due to Vietnam's "poorly defined" provisions 
for enforcing existing laws on mortgage and loan guarantees, the 
willingness of foreign leasing companies to participate is 
"uncertain." 

   Meanwhile, NIKKEI's 14 June edition stated that Vietcombank is 
planning a network of domestic and overseas branches.  The bank 
reportedly will establish its first foreign branch in Hong Kong 
early next year.  It is now setting up offices in France and Sweden 
and is considering opening offices in Tokyo, Singapore, and Moscow. 

   Domestically, the bank is augmenting its branches in export 
processing zones in response to economic growth and increased trade 
with foreign companies, the paper reported.  These include Tan Thuan 
in Ho Chi Minh City and future zones planned for Hanoi, Haiphong, Da 
Nang, Can Tho, and Lai Chau.  Branches are also being set up in Minh 
Hai, in the southernmost part of the country, and in Lang Son, on 
the PRC border.  NIKKEI noted that 23 domestic branches are planned 
altogether:  17 in the main cities, and six in the export processing 
zones. 

   Figures on Foreign Investment Projects Reported -- As of 18 
March, 897 foreign investment projects capitalized at $8.468 billion 
have been licensed.  Investment capital increased by an average of 
51.6 percent between 1988 and 1992.  In 1992, investment capital 
registered a 70-percent increase over the combined total of the four 
previous years, while the 1993 figure was 40 percent higher than the 
year before.  (Ho Chi Minh City SAIGON GIAI PHONG 24 Apr 94 p 2) 

   Between 1991 and 1993, investment in industries accounted for 45 
percent of the total registered capital.  By contrast, in previous 
years, there had been a heavier concentration of investment in 
hotels and oil and gas projects.  Investment in natural resources 
exploitation currently accounts for only 2 percent of total 
investment.  Provinces in mountainous areas that did not receive any 
foreign investment in the past have recently obtained about 35 
projects, capitalized at $175 million.  However, nationwide, a 
number of projects worth approximately $612.8 million have been 
terminated or withdrawn.  (Ho Chi Minh City THOI BAO KINH TE SAIGON 
27 Apr 94 pp 10, 11) 

   $4-Billion Investment Projected for Northern Economic Triangle -- 
Deputy Prime Minister Phan Van Khai recently approved a priority 
project under which Hanoi, Haiphong, and Ha Long city in Quang Ninh 
Province will form a "strategic triangle" for economic development. 
According to the Ministry of Construction, the investment estimate 
for this "northern priority triangle" will reach approximately $4 
billion by the year 2000. 

   The triangle will include industrial districts, export processing 
zones (EPZ), industrial parks, and tourist service districts in 
areas such as Soc Son-Noi Bai, Sai Dong, the southern part of Thang 
Long bridge, and Dong Anh in Hanoi; Minh Duc, Dinh Vu, Vat Cach, and 
Fourteenth Street in Haiphong; and Uong Bi and Quang Yen in Quang 
Ninh.  (Ho Chi Minh City TUOI TRE CHU NHAT 24 Apr 94 p 5) 

   Foreign Banks Seeking to Establish Branches -- Foreign banks have 
been seeking authorization to establish branches in Vietnam, 
according to the 10 June Tokyo NIKKEI KINYU SHIMBUN.  Currently, 
nine foreign banks have branches either in Hanoi or Ho Chi Minh 
City.  They include four French banks (Credit Lyonnais, Indosuez 
Bank, National Bank of Paris, French Foreign Trade Bank), two Thai 
banks (Bangkok Bank, Thai Military Bank), and one bank each for 
Taiwan (Cathay Investment and Trust) and Australia-New Zealand (ANZ 
Bank), according to the September 1993 Ho Chi Minh City THOI BAO 
KINH TE SAIGON.  Standard Chartered, the ninth bank, is British and 
was recently authorized to establish a branch in Hanoi, according to 
the 9 June NIKKEI KINYU. 

   The 10 June NIKKEI KINYU reported that approximately 20 foreign 
banks have either formally or informally sought authorization from 
the Vietnam State Bank--the central bank of Vietnam--to upgrade 
their representative offices to full branches.  (Representative 
offices typically do not engage in full banking operations.) 
Deutsche Bank, Hongkong and Shanghai Banking Corp., and the Korean 
Shinhan Bank expect to receive such authorization for their offices 
in Ho Chi Minh City between this summer and fall. 

   Japanese banks have the largest presence in terms of overall 
number of offices, according to the 8 June NIKKEI KINYU.  Seven of 
Japan's largest banks, including Bank of Tokyo, Daiwa, Sakura, 
Tokai, Fuji, Mitsubishi, and Sanwa have established representative 
offices in Ho Chi Minh City, while two others, Asahi and Sumitomo, 
expect to receive authorization to establish offices there by this 
summer.  According to NIKKEI KINYU, the Industrial Bank of Japan and 
Long-Term Credit Bank of Japan are currently planning to establish 
representative offices in Hanoi bringing to 11 the number of 
Japanese banks with offices in Vietnam.  No U.S., German, or 
Japanese bank presently has a branch in Vietnam, according to the 9 
June NIKKEI KINYU. 

   A Japanese bank will conclude what is reportedly the first 
agreement of its kind between the Vietnamese Government and a 
foreign bank, according to the 8 June NIKKEI KINYU.  Sakura Bank, 
one of Japan's leading commercial banks, and Vietnam's Ministry of 
Trade will provide one another with information on their domestic 
economies and industries and assist companies seeking to enter one 
another's market.  Sakura, which has counseled some 40 Japanese 
companies seeking to enter Vietnam in the past six months, expects 
the agreement to provide an avenue for accurate and timely 
information on commercial law and tax reform in Vietnam where 
information is conspicuously deficient. 

   Joint Venture Planned To Exploit Bach Ho LPG -- Japan's Mitsui 
and Co.  will join with the English firm British Gas, the Canadian 
firm Trans-Canada Pipelines, and Vietnam's state-run gas company 
Petro Vietnam in a three-way venture to exploit offshore gas 
produced at the Bach Ho fields.  Some $400 million will be invested 
in the project, which envisions building a 130-km pipeline to the 
mainland and an LPG (liquefied petroleum gas) plant in Vung Tau, as 
early as this year.  The British and Canadian companies will be 
responsible for the project's technology and the Japanese firm will 
handle sales.  South Korea's Hyundai Group will lay the pipeline and 
build other facilities.  A part of the planned 260,000-ton annual 
LPG production will be exported to Southeast Asia, China, and Japan, 
with the remainder used as fuel for a local power generating plant. 
There are plans to sell some of the gas later as a precursor for 
fertilizer and other chemical products.  (Tokyo NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN 
10 Jun 94 p 1) 

   Government Approves 'Largest' Port Construction Project -- A 
project to build a deep water port at Sao Mai-Ben Dinh, Ba Ria-Vung 
Tau Province at a total cost of more than $900 million has received 
government approval.  It will be built in two phases.  The first, 
from 1994 to 1997, consists of building a port that will receive 
ships with a maximum tonnage of 80,000 metric tons and include an 
industrial complex and a container platform.  In the second phase, 
from 1998 to 2000, the port will be enlarged to handle ships up to 
200,000 metric tons and a refinery and petroleum reservoir will be 
built.  Upon completion, the port will be the "largest" in Vietnam, 
with an installed capacity of 50 million metric tons per year.  The 
project involves a joint venture between the Service and 
Construction Investment Company of Ben Dinh Village and Japan's 
Tredia Investment Company.  (Hanoi VNA 0547 GMT 6 Jun 94) 

   Vietnam To Restrict Import of New Foreign Cars -- According to 
the Korea Trade Promotion Corporation, Vietnam has "strengthened" 
its regulations on foreign car imports, giving the right to import 
new foreign cars for less than 12 passengers to only eight 
companies, including Savico, while stipulating that importers of 
more than 50 cars at one time should receive import permission from 
the Ministry of Commerce and Tourism before granting letters of 
credit.  (Seoul MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN 9 Jun 94 p 11) 

   Foreign Investment in Road, Bridge Projects Reaches $700 Million 
-- More than $700 million in foreign capital has been invested in 
projects to restore, upgrade, or build bridges and roads during the 
past two years.  According to a forecast from economic offices, this 
figure will rise to about $800 million in 1996 and $1 billion in 
1997.  These funds are used mainly for projects such as the ones 
that restored and upgraded Highway No. 1, 100 km of Highway No. 5 
(linking Hanoi and Haiphong), and Highway No. 18, linking Bac Ninh 
with Quang Ninh.  (Hanoi VNA 0600 GMT 12 Jun 94) 


   Foreign Investment Capital Figures From 1988 to 1992 Reported -- 

   Sector                  Number of Projects    Registered Capital 
                                                 (in million 
                                                 dollars) 
   Industries              488                   3,557 
   (light, heavy, mining) 

   Oil, gas                26                    1,279 

   Agriculture, fishery,   94                      585 
   forestry 

   Postal, communications  20                      631 

   Tourist, hotels         106                   1,604 

   Services                115                     467 

   Banking, finance        13                      156 

   Others                  33                      221 


   Total                   895                   8,500 

   As of 25 December 1993, the actual committed capital of foreign 
investment projects accounts for about 30 percent of the registered 
capital, totaling $2.084 billion, of which $1.672 billion comes from 
foreign investors, $312 million from the Vietnamese side, and $100 
million in loans. 




   Year                   Investment Capital     Investment Capital 
                          of Licensed            of Operating 
                          Projects               Projects 
                          (in million dollars)   (in million 
dollars) 

   1988                    366                     234 
   1989                    539                     330.5 
   1990                    596                     482 
   1991                  1,288                   1,159 
   1992                  1,939                   1,921.6 
   1993                  2,728.4                 2,716.5 

   Total                 7,456.4                 6,843.8 




   Year                   Actual Committed       Investment Capital 
                          Capital                of Projects 
                          (in million dollars)   Withdrawn 
                                                 (in million 
dollars) 

   1988                    239                     132 
   1989                    366                     208.5 
   1990                    349                     114 
   1991                    513                     129 
   1992                    471                      17.4 
   1993                    146                      11.9 

   Total                 2,084                     612.8 

(Ho Chi Minh City THOI BAO KINH TE SAIGON 27 Apr 94 pp 10, 11) 



   Italian Businesses To Invest $48 Million in Vietnam -- Italian 
businesses are exploring cooperation opportunities in Vietnam and 
want to invest in the food industry, textiles, steel, granite, and 
cement.  A group of 22 Italian entrepreneurs and bankers recently 
paid a working visit to Hanoi and the industrial group Italia 
Confindustria plans to send specialists to study the Vietnamese 
economy and provide technical training for young Vietnamese 
industrialists.  According to the Italian Government's special envoy 
Rosolino Orlando, an initial investment of $48 million will be made, 
with increasingly larger investments to follow.  (Hanoi TUAN BAO 
QUOC TE 19-25 May 94 p 4) 

   Construction of 'Primary' Southern Port Started -- Construction 
of Phu My Port in Phu My Village, Chau Thanh District, Ba Ria-Vung 
Tau Province started on 30 April.  Investment in the project totals 
$9 million, of which 60 percent is contributed by the French 
companies Conco and Sogema and the Norwegian company Norsk Hydro. 
Construction will be completed in 16 months.  The part will be "the 
first primary port" in the Ho Chi Minh City-Dong Nai-Ba Ria-Vung Tau 
economic triangle.  During the first phase, it will be able to 
receive ships of 30,000-40,000 metric tons.  (Ho Chi Minh City 
SAIGON GIAI PHONG 2 May 94 p 1) 

   Joint Venture To Produce Nonalcoholic Beverages Licensed -- 
Vietnam's Vinalimex and the multinational company Coca-Coca 
Indochina Pte Ltd. have formed a 30-year joint venture to produce 
nonalcoholic beverages.  The new company is called Coca-Coca Ngoc 
Hoi.  It was licensed in April and is capitalized at $20.4 million, 
of which $15.46 million is prescribed capital.  (Hanoi NHAN DAN 7 
May 94 p 4) 

   Singapore Reported To Be Top ASEAN Investor -- According to the 
State Committee for Cooperation and Investment, Singapore is 
currently the top ASEAN investor in Vietnam.  To date, it has 
invested $544 million in 62 projects in the food, packaging, and 
electronic industries.  Vietnam has attracted $1 billion worth of 
foreign investment in the first five months of the year, of which 
$163 million came from Singapore.  (Singapore SBC 1400 GMT 10 Jun 
94) 

   Exports of Rice, Paddy to Taiwan, PRC Reported -- The Kien Giang 
Export-Import Joint Corporation has signed contracts worth $24 
million to export 106,000 metric tons of rice and 4,000 metric tons 
of paddy to Taiwan and the PRC.  These exports will occur between 
now and the end of the year.  (Hanoi Voice of Vietnam Network 1100 
GMT 17 Jun 94) 

   Canada Opens Trade Office in Ho Chi Minh City -- The Canadian 
Embassy has announced the establishment of the Canadian Trade Office 
in Ho Chi Minh City. The office will provide commercial information 
and will also serve Canadian joint ventures and direct investment 
projects.  Trade between Vietnam and Canada increased from $7.37 
million in 1989 to almost $42 million last year.  (Hanoi Voice of 
Vietnam 1000 GMT 13 Jun 94) 

   Indonesian Chemical Company Setting Up Joint Venture -- The 
Indonesian chemical manufacturer Unggul Indah Corp. will produce 
ingredients for synthetic cleansing agents in Vietnam in 
anticipation of increased demand from the influx of foreign 
companies there.  The firm will establish a $7.25-million joint 
venture called UIC Vietnam, through which it will import alkyl 
benzene produced in its Indonesia plant, for the manufacture 
alkylbenzene sulfonate (a precursor for cleaners) in Vietnam.  Some 
30,000 tons will be produced annually starting this year.  About 
half this amount is used in Vietnam at present, all imported from 
neighboring countries.  More than 10 projects involving joint 
ventures with Indonesian companies have been approved by the 
Vietnamese Government to date.  (Tokyo NIKKEI SANGYO SHIMBUN 12 Jun 
94 p 3) 

   Construction of 'Largest' Rice Mill in Mekong Delta Completed -- 
Tien Giang, the "largest" rice mill in the Mekong Delta, was 
recently completed.  The mill's processing capacity is 150 metric 
tons of paddy a day.  Equipment for the mill came from India.  Tien 
Giang is a 20-year joint venture between the Tien Giang Insecticide 
Company and Agrocommodities Co of the French Orco group.  Initial 
investment capital in the venture totals $3 million, with the two 
sides holding equal shares.  (Hanoi NHAN DAN 4 May 95 p 1) 

   (Pacific Rim Economic Review FBPSP 94-13) 

JF 30/0345Z JUN 

